He’s the son of GRTR! MD David Randall.
While he was thrashing around in the dark they quietly circled. They had picked up his scent, and the sweet aroma of flesh drew them to him like a beacon. It had been days since they had eaten, and their shrunken stomachs rumbled in pain. With cold precision they closed in on him, flanking him on all sides. Their need to eat was a primal lust, it took precedent over, sleep, warmth, procreation. It had become their singular driving force these past few days. Prey had become scarce, and they were getting desperate.
Before I post my 90% percent finished Studio pics, I wanted
Princeton University
So next Friday will be our second edition of Foodie Friday ... I hope you visit again or we'd love to have you Follow this blog and automatically know what we've posted. And as a "bonus" for this first feature, if you're looking for a suggestion to serve with this salad, how about a Butternut Squash Beef Stew with Balsamic Vinegar and Rosemary ... your welcome ... that recipe is here. Thanks again!
It was a lorry that had been comprehensively overhauled in anticipation, naturally, but never mind. The pictures were good.
When I was a kid I used to sell stuff. My mother encouraged me because she wanted me to become a businesswoman. I eventually stopped because it was hard to keep track of the businesses and keep up with my homework.
Miss Shoemaker was an old-fashioned teacher who considered herself responsible not just for our academic progress, but for our health and morals as well. Daily inspections of hands and fingernails for cleanliness occurred. Her shrewd eyes took in a missing button or a tear in our uniforms. She’d dash off little notes, "Give this to your mother. Your tunic needs mending." Occasionally, she’d complete the repair herself, whipping out navy cotton thread or white, fishing buttons from a small box she kept in her desk.
Wait, there’s more? Of the same fucking dude!?!
Off to Colombia…
“That I may know him, and the power of his resurrection, and the fellowship of his sufferings, being made conformable unto his death.”
That’s it.
In “The 17 Indisputable Laws of Teamwork” I write about the ‘Law of Dividends’, which is, “Investing in the team compounds overtime.” As you invest in your team, especially if you have them in the right place, the team is going to compound in a very positive way for you. Of course, if you don’t have the right players in the right place, time isn’t going to do it.
I hope that you see right through my walls
paid: $0.56!
The ugly crop of the seed that they sow
Long before Jack left his South Carolina hometown to attend college and eventually move to New York afterward to become an investment banker he remembered his grandmother talking about something called a conniption fit. According to her, it was the worst of behaviors usually reserved for hopelessly spoiled children who desperately needed a good, old-fashioned spanking with a belt until they could not sit down anymore. As a child Jack had never actually seen the nearly mystical seizure put on by anyone but the woman he believed to be his new wife was surely showing him one now.
Around 5:30 pm, one of the Occupiers climbed on the roof and began throwing heavy metal pipes, bricks and other objects down on the police and crowd gathered outside the building. While several bricks were aimed at the officers on Turk Street, only one of the demonstrators was hurt when he was hit in the face by a brick. The man on the roof, Jesse Nesbit, 34, was arrested after he left the building and charged with felony assault.
Jack's class also does this cute little thing where the teacher sends home "Pelican Pete' and whichever kid takes him home that night writes a cute little story about what they did with Pete. Jack thinks he's adorable!
Mr. Stokes began his career with the State of North Carolina in the mail room after passing the civil service examination for a Statistician. After his first year with the Department of Correction, he was promoted to the Office of Research and Planning where he worked for twenty-nine years retiring as a time series Analyst.
After rinsing off the river water we assembled again and headed off to check out the Texas wine scene. We managed to herd most of our group to the Mandola Estate Winery, located in a lovely setting in rolling hills just south of Austin, with rows of grape vines improbably planted among the cattle ranches and barbeque pits of this area. A beautiful limestone building houses a restaurant and winery, with wine tastings available. We tasted a Pinot Grigio, Viognier, Rose, and Zinfandel, among others. Most were not memorable, though drinkable, with the Viognier standing out as the crowd favorite. The ambiance was lovely and the family enjoyed cheese and crackers, sipping wine and enjoying each others’ company.
A view of a boutique inside the Melbourne Central shopping complex.
Monday morning saw the MoS heading back to work and me back to my apartment, where the cats gave me a talking to about leaving them on their own for 3 1/2 days. I think Lila was telling me about all the fun she had, and Pips gave me hell for not being around to scratch her neck and make my lap available when she required it!
PILM: I know what you mean, it seems a lot more emphasis is put on the digital aspect of creating those sounds, like using pre-set reverb that emulates a certain room or size. What do you think about the digital age of music?
Oh. That must have been in very small print.
“Third, I will support my own church.
I will likely pick up a little more, as I watch clearance racks all year around.
In March 1954 Maxwell Fyfe told Cabinet, “that large numbers of coloured people are living on National Assistance” and that “coloured landlords by their conduct are making life difficult for white people living in the same building or area…the result is that white people leave and the accommodation is then converted to furnished lettings for coloured people, with serious overcrowding and exploitation”.
Crafty Teacher
Toiletries: Bottle of Aussie Shampoo (29.2 oz), bottle of Suave Conditioner (32 oz), Tresemme’ Split Remedy Leave in conditioning treatment, Garnier Fructis smoothing milk, Garnier Fructis styling putty, Bodycology body lotion, set of pedicure toe separators, 2 John Frieda shampoo/conditioner samples, 1 Biore face wash sample, silver basket
Speaking of which, I need to go feed him again now. I'm going to make my sponge with him on Sunday and if all goes well, I will be able to share my first loaf of sour dough bread from Finn Jr. on Monday with some friends we're having over for dinner. I'm actually going to be sad when it becomes time for me to put Finn Jr. into the fridge and I don't have to feed him everyday but like all children, he will need to move out of the nest and learn to fend mainly on his own.
to raise $10,000 for scholarship money...
The Ranger asked where she was and my dad pointed to the power boat bobbing at the dock. The Ranger, who happened to be a Medic, jumped in his Jeep, radioed for an ambulance, drove down the ramp, grabbed his bag and ran to where she was in the boat. He, on the bobbing boat, started an I.V. of something, and then the ambulance was there and they were loading her onto the gurney.
I also moved the butterfly bush. It is also too big and needs too much sun for where it fits. So he's gone out back to the parking area where he can have all the room and sun he can stand. I won't really get to see him much as he lies beyond the fence... but hey, my neighbors will be happy come August with this great purple bush growing where weeds once grew.
· Experience using rapid UI prototyping tools is highly desirable
Bright then shadowed
Ann Romney has said that her chosen career was being a mother. I couldn't agree more. For women like us, raising our children is the most important job we can have. For me, being the subject of my daughter's essay on role models is better than any bonus. Seeing my children using the life lessons I have tried to instill in them to raise themselves up and strive for more is better than any promotion. And contrary to Ms. Rosen's bungled talking points, staying home isn't a 'luxury' for most women, it just makes sense. I take nothing from working moms - I was raised by two and used to be one myself. I have enormous respect for women who pursue a career and manage to juggle it all. But because our priorities are different from Ms. Rosen's doesn't make them any less legitimate
On Friday, my colleagues and I ordered some Chinese food to be delivered. I love Sesame Chicken. However, I don't love all Sesame Chicken. More than Sesame Chicken, I love egg drop soup. Delicious.
Chapter 6 of Shawn Ritenour’s Foundations of Economics examines what happens when the supply or demand of a good or service in the marketplace changes. Ritenour makes the point that confusion sometimes results from a change in market prices. When the price of, say, coffee rises, this is not necessarily indicative of a rise in demand. Demand may be exactly the same as before, but a reduction of supply may have led to the price increase. The reverse is also true; a price may change even though supply is constant if demand changes.
White: Correct. And if you’re not weak, you’re . .?
I helped him open his as he was too intoxicated to muster that action. It was a luxury watchbox (much like a jewelry box) that would hold 6 of his prize possessions—his watch collection.
A good guide to make good white rice and make it grainy but soft at the same time is that for every cup of rice use 1 ½ cup water, salt and oil to taste.
In between this time I meet hubby. We dated four short months before he proposed. It honestly was love at first sight. We also discovered that having children might be difficult because after suffering for years I was finally diagnosed with endometriosis, which meant my fallopian tubes had a build of up scar tissue. I had surgery at the age of 25 and was told to start trying to have children immediately. We did just that thinking it would take years but we were blessed and nine months later our first son was
And I barely made it on time. Barely. (I misjudged how far away this place would be. It’s literally at the tail end of the county I live in! Literally!) It took me 40 minutes in non-rush hour traffic, driving 80 miles an hour. Imagine what rush hour traffic will look like?
Oh dither dither dither.
--When people stare at me for a long time--even if it's just checking me out, or trying to figure out my race or what have you--I avoid looking at them, because I interpret their staring as a threat.
department stores
Tuesday, we had an important visitor at work so I felt like I needed to wash it. I did the BS wash, ACV rinse, put a bit of EVOO on my ends (although I think I used too much) and then blow-dried it on the coolest setting. It took forever but it wasn't so bad. Then I flat ironed it on 300. It didn't get all of the waves out but it was passable. I was pretty happy with it. It looks a lot fuller and thicker than normal. My ends were sort of clumped which I think was due to the EVOO.
Here is my plan:
Your audience doesn’t have all day to read your collateral, so you need to grab their attention, inform them and get them to take action in as little sentences as possible. Don’t talk around your topic, and don’t say the same thing in multiple ways.
Something that has come up, and keeps coming up, is Thrall’s “real name” — that being Go’el. This was first revealed to us by Greatmother Geyah in Nagrand back in ‘The Burning Crusade.’ Now, it has become a topic of intense discussion when concerning our Warchief. Aggra, a female orc assigned to further Thrall’s training as a shaman seems to be spearheading an effort to have him fully adopt his ‘real name’ and ‘become who he truly is.’
When the Jesuits are successful in taking over the United States and converting it into a ruthless police state, the people of the country will begin to realize what has happened to them. But then, of course, it will be too late to do anything about it.
Sodium 96.3 mg
JEFFERSON T. Author’s response to influenza vaccination: policy v evidence. Br Med J 20006; 333: 1172.
Indeed. The parables turn our conceptions inside out and outside in as he further observes for us:
Carefully dip entire cupcake or three quarters of the cupcake into the nonpareils, depending on the look you are trying to create. If only dipping ¾ of the cupcake into the nonpareils, try to create a straight edge where the glaze and nonpareils meet. The glaze will act as the bunnies head.
sugar 3 cups
I wanted the tags to have a seal, so they wouldn't rip or tear and I wanted to be able to fit a safety pin through them. It took me a little while to figure out how to seal them. If I laminated them, they'd be too thick. I decided to use, the ever so awesome, Mod Podge to seal them.
14 - Skinhead Sunstomp! (3:14)
Then we finally boarded our elevator car, anticipation built as we traveled to the top making a couple stops on the way.
He remembered me from last time, as I was the one who tried to communicate with him…”tried” being the operative word, of course. He asked if I still had my dictionary and I told him I did. I fished around in my bag, found it, and showed it to him. He took it from me, stuck it in his pocket, and said, “Thank you. Next time I speak English.” Um, okay.
Fitton and Schuman are having coffee and postulating theories while the coroner tries to ascertain the cause of death. It's been 72 hours and still nothing until Fitton's phone rings.
Above all, a creepy feel is well-maintained throughout most of the movie.
Hi everyone, I have not posted in a few days, I have been working on things, but nothing is finished but have some thing coming up so come back see what it's all about.
* I have officially completed two weeks of the Fat Flush diet and have lost a total of eight pounds so far. Last week was rough with four late nights at work, I wasn’t able to fit the gym into my schedule. I am feeling good doing this diet. Turned down red velvet cake, whoopie pie cake, and a cupcake. That’s right. Go me. The diet is restricting and makes it hard to eat on the run, but I am sticking with it. Discipline baby. I will get back into a size 10. I will get back into a size 10.
A peaceful dream......
This is what you see when you first come into our house. This is what Jon and I saw the first day we ever came into our house.
I notice the breeze across my face.
8. The Good, the Bad, and the Ugly
Her mother snapped as she spanked Lyndsee's hand away from the cookie dough. The seven-year-old fair-headed child sprung back, rubbing the loose skin on her hand. Her face shriveled up like silly putty into a pout. Her lower lip swelled pink and juicy while her brow furrowed like a melting candle.
between the
This top tote is the yarn for my Bargello Beauty afghan that I worked on for a bit last year with a few other odds and ends of stuff. It's been in very slow progress since 2007. One day I will finish it, really I will.
His snakehood and his might with pliant tunes
Along with finding some really great books, keeping track of what I read has benefits, especially when people ask me for book recommendations for those age groups. The more MG and YA fiction I read, the more I realize how much I enjoy it. The stories are faster paced and usually always emotionally satisfying. There are so many good children's writers, I never feel that I'm missing something by not reading more books for adults.
C'Mon by The Dragons
1 Tbsp baking powder Due to the large amount, I recommend using aluminum free for better taste.
Today I know that it is Red Nose Day here in Australia. I know that this cause is very close to one of my BFF's hearts, so that makes it important to me too.
Those two weeks were like living within the commune we’d all jokingly dreamed of, but with a greater purpose.
So in a flood of emotions I erased our post about our baby news, now I wish I hadnt.
I'm feeling good. Really good. But then I start to psych myself out. As the 5K runners split off to their finish and I keep going I start to wonder if I can keep this pace for much longer. I should have done the 5K! I think to myself. Why am I not doing the 5K?
16. Because few others in your society have the knowledge you do, reactions of the masses to forthcoming profound truths, reforms and the introduction of other members of the universal family will be confusion, denial and varying degrees of fear. Your calming influence will be greatly needed, and as we often have stated, you are well prepared not only to deal with whatever you encounter, but to help all who are willing to accept it. It is not necessary to know the missions you chose in soul contracts — when occasions are presented, you will see that your spiritual strength, wisdom and experiences in multiple lifetimes will be at your fingertips.
My own personal experience of screening the The Forgotten Refugees and The Silent Exodus in venues across London, always ends with most people in the audience (both Jewish and non) telling me that they had no idea about the plight of these Jewish refugees. Even children of the Sephardim (Jews who settled around the Mediterranean basin) and Mizrahim (‘eastern’ Jews ) don't know how their parents suffered in Arab lands, as they have been reluctant to recount their stories. They arrived in Israel and the West stripped of their assets on leaving their birth countries, but at least the majority had escaped with their lives. Hearing the horror stories of the Holocaust in Europe, they felt unable to retell their stories. In those early years they suffered silently and experienced the double humiliation of being treated as 2nd class citizens by the ruling Ashkenazi elite.
Comfort from Government promises
What did you do? Did you go anywhere? How did you bring in the NY?
There were hockey rinks, soccer fields, a gym with a working scoreboard. What house is complete without one? They have their own performing studios, and an “every day is a holiday” theme so they can keep the Christmas tree up all year-long. I’ve seen a chair museum in place of a dining room table, psychedelic, modern, artistic mansions, no MANSIONS. These homes are described by their parents as “having a place where we all feel comfortable.” Give me a break.
Maybe if I related to her as a woman. But, she is a mother, if by a mother you mean a female parent. Sometimes DD calls K "Mommy," which doesn't bother me. She is being calmer with the kids, which is nice. Today at lunch she actually shared her cheese curds with the kids, which is, sadly, like woaaaaaaaaaa, crazy. She said she is following the WWLD principle (L being me, the family's sacrificial lamb).
The museum is divided into 3 levels: the first depicts Van Gogh's influences and their work, the second shows his contemporaries and how they influenced his work, and the third reveals other famous artists(and contemporaries) that were creating at the same time as Van Gogh. You need a couple of hours at least, but worth the time in order to examine his techniques and influences.
And may a lesser bell sound through the room;
With chaste refined love
I'll visit when I can and hope to be back in action in a week or two.
I can’t believe it’s been 10 years since Jingle Dancer was published. But the evidence stares back at me when I look at the photos we (Ying-Hwa and I) took of the jingle dancers at a powwow we attended as a family.
I was thinking today about all the childhood tv shows I used to watch (I know ANOTHER reminiscing topic!) and I can’t help but think how crappy cartoons are nowdays compared to the one’s that used to be on.. I feel sorry for kids these days growing up without CatDog, Hey Arnold!, Ahhh Real Monsters, Rugrats (before they got old) Rainbow Bright, Evil Sesame Street (where the cookie monster ate cookies and Oscar the grouch was still a grumpy fuck) Those shows didn’t hurt me, or anyone else for that matter so why replace it with this crap.. Personally I think that Ben 10 is much more fucked up than anything else from back then.. I once saw an episode that began in 2 cars driving at night, the one behind put on his high beams and tailgated, intentionally trying to scare the car in front until it ran off the road and crashed..
Computer Font: Pooh.
Every citizen shall have the right to participate in the political, economic, social and cultural life and the law shall regulate this.
Tofu with Broccoli Dish
Invariably, the cast and crew go on the most exotic of roadies to a dazzling tropical locale.
Top tens selected from the worldinterwidenetweb.
Last night was sleepless, a rare symptom here, and during it I thought this: our contents insurers have appointed a firm to try to get Upstairs’ insurers to pay for the ceiling. They sent me some questions, and were kind enough to say that my answers were helpful. If they succeed, surely Upstairs’ insurers have also thereby acknowledged their responsibility for our things, a few feet below. Whether they (the things) were insured or not is totally irrelevant. And if Upstairs’ insurance doesn’t extend to our things, then…
sure, i had shown him outside and the snow through the window before.
If you've seen me recently, then there is a good chance you've seen me wearing these earrings. I wear them several times a week. I mean, really, owls go with everything!
Our mother was a yellow-haired enchantress who wore dangling orb earrings, tie-dyed dresses and crocheted sandals. She derived pleasure in casting her spells upon men of the cloth, and casting them aside.
Infographic: How cyber-secure are public companies? – Takeaway: This infographic presents some less-than-stellar numbers illustrating how well public companies are securing their web applications.
This year has been a long one. I’ve felt it pass by in leaps and long drawn out pockets of exhausting slowness, in the incomprehensible way that time does. Contacting and expanding with the matter of fact-ness of a science experiment.
Concepta also gave me a very detailed map of the section of Co Cavan where my Brady and Coyle ancestors lived. She highlighted the areas where they could be found over the years. This included churches they attended. She also gave us a modern day, local map and showed us how the two maps overlapped so we could leave the library, take N55 onto R154 to Killinaleck and find our way from there. My daughter will agree that my navigating skills are not the equal of her driving skills but we thanked Concepta for her research time and results and were soon back in the little
BEACON RADIO, (Wolverhampton)
The Friend Who Just Stands By
I read over and over--and I really do believe it's true--that one of the most important parts of a witch's practice is learning to make meditation and visualization a regular part of their day. I KNOW this...I BELIEVE this...so why, Oh WHY,. is this so hard for me to do? I mean, ya, I get busy. I have a 9 year old son and husband. I have a job. I have a home to take care of. I am sure if I really wanted to I could sit down and make a big long list of all the reasons why I have not made these things a priority in my life--I am sure we all could. The problem with this is--I KNOW I could find the time somewhere. I know there are times when my butt is sitting at this computer that I could be doing other things. So really all my excuses could fall by the wayside. In other words--they don't hold water. They just don't.
It's a dark red-brown colour with a nice thick stouty head. And it tastes of gingerbread. Cocoa nibs and ginger stems are listed as the bonus add-ons, but I'm not getting much chocolate flavour, or stout flavours generally. Just gingerbread, or possibly ginger biscuits. Nice as it goes, but I was bored before the end of 33cl.
Dose greedy guys ain’t never grateful.
What makes the process of ternary thinking fascinating is that its effects are not necessarily limited to the person who practices it. Fairly often, when a discussion is mired in reactive binary thinking, it only takes one person resolutely bringing up a third option over and over again, to pop at least some of the participants out of the binary trap, and get them thinking about other options. They may end up staying with the option they originally supported, but they’re more likely to do it in a reasoned way rather than an automatic, unthinking way. They’re also more likely to be able to recognize that the other sides of the debate also have their points, and to be able to find grounds for mutual cooperation, because they aren’t stuck in a mental automatism that loads a torrent of positive emotions onto their side of the balance and an equal and opposite torrent of negative emotions onto the other side.
I started tracking the courier, On 6th it said dispatched from ncarry, Gurgaon. On 7th, it has reached Aramex Bangalore warehouse. On Monday 9th, I called Aramex they assured me the delivery will happen in next 24 hours. Nothing happened.
As he doesn’t remember very well any more which ones, he takes the number of Simplicissimus where his story is printed and that he has not re-read – for he hates re-reading his own works – and runs through the text.
let it set out to dry up for a few days.
Ideas and suggestions are welcome! :)
Today was Jazz Fest down at the Fair Grounds. We were pretty impressed that it was the whole Fairgrounds, Race track area included. there was 5 different major stages and I think we caught acts on all 5 through out the day. We split up and the “Littles” as I call them (Taylor, Sarah and Dani) took off to wander the grounds and merchandise stalls and catch as many acts as they could. I started off my day with Marissa and Brittaney until we lost each other. The Fairgrounds were packed and there was some amazing music. My fav was Trombone Shorty and they were stoked to catch Iron and Wine. We also saw Al Green, caught a Secondline parade and saw the very entertaining Janella Monet. I got to see a whole bunch of Mardi Gras Indians sing “li’l Liza Jane” and that totally made my day!
Christmas, for those who believe and even those who are skeptics, is the power of God to change human lives. It conveys the hope that there really can be peace on earth, and that mankind can learn to love and prosper under the guiding and loving watch of a gracious and awesome supreme being. Christmas is, by its very nature, eternal, remaining in the soul and influencing the entire world. A holiday ends when the day is done. Christmas is the centerpiece toward which an entire year propels itself. This celebration crowns all others in its nobility and grace, its beauty and charisma. Even Santa Claus would be absent were it not for the inspiration of a real saint named Nicholas who gave out gifts and was attributed as having performed miracles.
HOW THE FLYING FUCK
Lucky had plans for Rob and I to write his cookbook of jealously guarded recipes for him. That all came to a bit of a sticky end when, one evening hanging about in our press office lair, he demanded money (without menaces) from us for what he considered the privilege of writing his cookbook for him. Lucky, it’s the other way around, you’d need to pay us to write it for you, Rob told him. Ras-clat, you no understand, countered Lucky. These are my recipes. You two g’wan pay I. Lucky’s reputation preceded him; he wasn’t really a man to argue with and whether he still packed a gun was open to debate but his hard-man reputation was very real.
And, of course what’s a street fair without talking food. I love food. But, I am crazy about street fair food. I called up my sweetie pie Drake and asked him if he wanted to dine with me. He was probably more excited than I was because he went to University of Oregon 20 years ago and has lots of fond memories of Street Fair.
The beginning of the High Street is marked by what is today called Littlehampton United Church. Built in 1861, the church today apparently serves two congregations, hence the slightly odd name. It is used by both Methodist and United Reformed Church congregations. I suppose that, in an age where people are increasingly seeing through the deceit and delusion of religion and, consequently, church attendance is going into mortal decline with large numbers of churches being decommissioned, it make sense to combine resources in this way.
I think there is little reason to go out in public unarmed anymore. If you are going to get a CCW, then learn the tools needed to do so safely and effectively. The second video is an excellent one to understand how to do CCW and not be uncomfortable. Remember, if you are uncomfortable you won’t carry, and if you won’t carry then you are not protecting yourself or your family. I respect the police and worked with them for years. I did not know a single rogue cop. Every officer I knew would give their life to protect the citizens, but the sad fact is that most police show up after the crime to gather evidence and write reports. They cannot be there for you most of the time, and you are responsible for your life and the life of your family. Learn how to do it safely, skillfully, and effectively!
My delicate filigree floral cut has been done with my Bliss – aka – Cameo machine. I used my printable paper pack for this. (I got my replacement blades from Silhouette Support Europe yesterday by the way.. all smiles here, they sent me two! Happy happy happy! And they gave me a $25 credit for my having to wait over a month for them to come… such wonderful customer service or what?!)
Acrylic and paper textures
Above all of this, I met someone at a private lunch. This person inspired me for a longer period of time already and I just couldn't believe talking to her the past days. A separate blogpost will surely follow. Keep watching.
12.07.08 US Columbus, The Shelf
DÖF Codo D/A
Government policies have made cars unaffordable, while raising public transport costs. It’s like the person-in-charge Googled: “Inflation and How to Cause It”, and started taking notes.
Anthony, Lisa and I made a guillotine complete with a "blood" soaked blade. The severed head will be placed in the basket on Monday. Ah yes, a warm cozy, Hallmark, sort of family moment.
Yoochun pull out and lay beside Junsu. He pulls Junsu closer and hugs him.
It stressed the need to support
Me: "I'm still coming over, you know."
For the last year or so, all Wild Turkey and Russell's Reserve products have been made in a brand spanking new distillery. Whiskey made in the old distillery will be around for several more years, but they aren't making any more of it, so stock up now.
"Fine."
I admit to holding him and spoiling him a ton since he came home. My mom thinks I will teach him bad habits. I say I don't care. He hardly got held for the first 2 weeks of his life and I am making up for it now big time. (Another reason why I haven't posted pics I guess. It's hard when your arms are full of baby.)
He traveled quite a bit so I had a lot of down time but instead of sitting around doing nothing, I used that as an opportunity to learn other aspects of the company and take on new responsibilities. Within six months, I not only was supporting the V.P. but was also in charge of their new building & employee security system, became their facility coordinator, assisted the IT staff with the network, and developed and taught my own computer classes to teach engineers how to use Microsoft Office programs. Even though the company had increased their support staff, many of the entry-level engineers still had to do much of their own paperwork. You’d be surprised at how many of them couldn’t even create a simple Word or Excel document or make a Powerpoint presentation.
Having established the starting point, the sentencer moves to consider whether there were any aggravating or mitigating factors. There is a standalone guideline dealing with seriousness, and this includes (pages 6 and 7) a long list of potential aggravating factors.
The Kuru King and his brothers are Yuddhiṣṭhira, Bhīma, Arjuna, Nakula and Sahadeva. Their wife is Draupadī. Their mother is Kuntī. Dhṛtarāṣtra and Gāndhārī are the father and mother of the opposing side, who tried to cheat their way onto the throne. After the war was over, the members of both side of the previously divided family united to mourn their dead together. That seems a significant moral lesson.
When I woke, I could hear one of my guides telling me quite loudly to go for a walk. I’ve learned through experience to trust my guides and go with whatever they’re telling me because they’re always right. I splashed some cold water on my face, changed into some clothes and grabbed a quick cup of coffee to take along on my walk. I was staying at Marga Country Park, home of a magnificent estate built around 1870 and just below the estate were the ruins of an old Abby. The estate or castle, whichever you prefer to call it, was from the neo-gothic time period surrounded by lush gardens and the beautiful rolling hills of Wales. In the distance, nestled high on a hillside, you could see the ruins of a monastery. Now being a bit of nature person, I thought to myself what a wonderful place to go for a stroll and maybe, just maybe, a brilliant idea would come to me for my speech.
Today the Potala Palace is a state museum, a popular tourist attraction, and a UNESCO World Heritage Site. It was also recently named one of the "New Seven Wonders of the World" by the television show Good Morning America and the newspaper USA Today.
Actually, this has been quite a liberating experience. I'm still Mom,, but for the first time in 25 years, my days are not consumed with someone else first. Believe it or not, it took some getting over the guilt trip I placed on myself.
Ingredients: Roasted peanuts, sugar and salt.
The year on the dime was 197 4. Both of us acknowledged where we were that year.
P.S. Are you willing to support the Israeli merchants in Trondheim? Come to the MIFF meeting on Wednesday, March 7, and buy their products.
“Five ampere would do it. To excite the particles, reinvigorate the tissue, reawaken cellular intelligence.”
Lots of people are able to get other people’s information within a blink of an eye. The marketers are continuously calling you to promote some plans by sharing your information around. You may feel bored and desire to find a way to stop this.
+ Fresh Carmel Corn from Bonnie Brynteson
Now about housing: This is big potential for creating jobs. If there is no money you cannot pay rent or mortgage loans. Really the ideal thing would be to say to start with is: whatever house you are in for now is yours. There are very few reasons why someone needs more than one house and they can always be accounted for in allowances. Yes there will be also shitholes out there, but that is where the jobs come in. So many people don’t have homes or the accommodation they do have is uninhabitable or in run down areas. For those with inadequate housing, we just start a list much like a housing list for council accommodation in Britain, except it registers all available housing, monitors their condition; making repairs when needed. As soon as new or renovated buildings are ready they get matched against the needs of those at the top of the list, with those in the most need due to age, ill health or the condition of their current residence, being given priority for the available housing first.
Found this great site to help me understand what fruits and vegetables are in season – I was soo frustrated that I wasn’t able to find a particular squash and come to find out, it’s a fall vegetable! So this guide breaks down every month what’s in season for me so there’s no more wondering.
Press my face to the glass in case I could magically retrieve my keys.
For details on how unsafe South Africa has become as a result of this near-sighted anti-white employment policy by the ANC, read http://censorbugbear-reports.blogspot.com. The only people who have benefited are the 5% ANC-elite who have grown so rich that they are now being referred to as the 'black diamonds', while their fellow blacks are languishing in dreadful poverty, disease and misery.
Well, most of us have words we've heard but never seen written, and when we write them, we think of the alternate word....
I have grown up with Palace with my granddad taking me along with my dad, my whole childhood revolved around Palace matches with my dad and granddad. My granddad needed a reason to stop going so that he could get his time with his wife, my nan, back and he used the sale of Jerry Murphy to do it. He never went to another game after that.
Tax payments twice yearly
Maggie: "Iyayoo."
Branches
There is a rhythm here on the farm, an ebb and flow of seasons... a time for raising chickens, a time for breaking new ground in the garden, a time for allowing the garden to dry up and die. As the years pass, we begin to learn the language of our farm and understand the seasons.
From the looks of it, however, Australia is taking quite a beating from Mother Nature. Of course, they were assured that (according to Al Gore & Co.) it would be a dry, warm year down there.
“Smart, scary, suspenseful enough for me to keep the light on until 3AM on a Sunday night, Richard Godwin once more proves to fans of crime fiction the world over with Mr. Glamour, that he is not only one of the best contemporary writers of the procedural cop thriller around today, he is a master storyteller.”
Part of the reason why I love giving out greeting cards is because of the thought that comes with it.Though it is a given that each time you give a gift , it is the thought that always count, the mere simplicity of the act plus the poetry written on the card touches anyone's heart especially if you are not really good with words or had ran out of it.
Treat-brownies
One aim of BookTown Australia is to give World Book Day a context to be celebrated in Australia and link it to the international community of booktowns. Using World Book Day as the commencement of the One Town – One Book community reading programs is seen as viable means of doing so, especially as the reading program can then culminate in August to coincide with Children’s Book Week. On World Book Day (April 23) in Australia in years to come, any community – village, town suburb or city – can be a “booktown” on that day, simply by declaring its participation in the reading program with the announcement of their chosen book.
a) blow it off, because this is a silly, artificial construct, designed to do nothing more than make parents feel better than other parents, and I know that she's hyper and a ferociously good reader ANYWAY, or:
Red Mist, Patricia Cornwell - The book released a while ago, but I started to read it and just couldn't get into the story. So I left it alone for a while. Finally had nothing left to read and decided to finish it, and I'm glad I did. Kay Scarpetta travels to the Georgia Prison for Women, where she meets with an inmate who has apparent information about the death of Scarpetta's former assistant, now deceased. It turns out his death is related to other deaths, his lover is involved in some serial killings, her daughter is a killer, too... After the first few chapters, it was back to Cornwell's usual good story.
I have never had students create comic strips in class even though I have heard of it often. I think it is because I had in my head that the comic had to be funny, and I thought it would be difficult for studens to create funny situations with whatever we were studying at the time. I am warming up to the idea, however, realizing that the word “comic” can be used loosely to basically mean a dialogue in comic strip format. I still have not had students create the comics yet, but I did create some comic strips at Make Beliefs Comix for students to fill in the last speech bubble. All of the scenarios are inviting someone to do something, but they decline the invitation and tell what they are going to do instead based on the excuse I wrote in the comic strip. I’ll see how it goes tomorrow; maybe I’ll have the students create their own comic strips as the next step.
But by 2002, that was no longer true in Lake Huron. That year, researchers observed something they didn’t believe, at first. Four out of every five salmon were wild.
This week’s favourite quote from She:
I looked down again at the lost girl lying asleep in eternity and knew that my heart would ache to feel the tears of rain or light of the moon again.
8. Miki Hirayama - Itsuka Doko Kade
“Are you saying he smells like a gorilla?” asked the tourist.
Yet the APA marches on oblivious and ignorant like the emperor in the fairy tale in his new outfit.
I am not an advocate of banning cigarettes and alcohol. I just don’t understand why we single them out for being legal, when marijuana, cocaine, and heroin could have more legitimate medical uses. Marijuana apparently is good for both easing the pain of some cancers and AIDS, and for treating glaucoma. I can speak from firsthand experience that cocaine is an excellent coagulant and can be used in times when there is a hemorrhage. And Nirvana frontman Kurt Cobain once said that heroin was the only thing he could find that would ease the pain of his congenital stomach problems. I believe him.
The blue mist gathered into a small ball and then began to take the shape of a small black boy around the age of six or seven. Russell can’t help but to grin at the solemn child standing before him.
She advocated a detoxification program and special diet that emphasized raw or lightly cooked, primarily vegetarian foods, with special vitamin and nutritional supplements.
The book is filled with photos of the beloved walkway taken by Krogius over the years (he has lived in the neighborhood since before the Promenade even opened in 1951).
riding in the darkened night.
‘Terry? It’s Dick Madeley here. Glad I caught you. Listen. I’d like to take you up on your offer. Yes, that one. I know it’s a bit short notice but...’
Methods: We located and characterized papers published in peer-reviewed journals which reported autistic cognitive strengths. In order to be included, studies had to compare the performance of autistics to the performance of nonautistics on a task, and autistics had to be reported to perform better than their controls on the task. Studies specific to autistic savants and hyperlexics were excluded, as were probable but unclear reports of autistic strengths, and accidental findings arising from matching strategies. Autistic cognitive strengths originally reported and/or interpreted as deficits were included.
But it’s because of those two reasons that it is SO evident to me of God’s timing and will for that to have happened when it did. And never once has that been doubted!
Now, Jimmy Falon is funny, so if I make the mistake of not turning off the television early on, I’m sucked into his silliness. But I’ll pull out the computer, check email and some online news sources, more winding down, then I get to the work itself.
In To The Woods
Maeric raced down the passage from C.I.C. to the squadron ready rooms, which would lead him to the Viper and Raptor bays. The ship was bustling with personnel like a disturbed hive of bees. They all knew their duties, nobody needed told what to do. They had a lot of raw recruits aboard, but they had some of the most well trained officers in the Fleet to take charge of any situation.
4. Add a codicil or section to our wills and trusts that specifically instructs the transfer and hoped for survivability of your genealogical records and data. See an example of the verbiage here in one of my earlier posts.
Sierra Nevada and Dogfish Head to release “Life & Limb” Collaboration
And to get those juices flowing... let me show you some of the just released today digital images from PMS suited perfectly for this challenge!!!
This weekend is AJ's First Communion and Grandparents' Day at his school, so ya-ya-ma and Papa Joe arrive this afternoon. The kids have been COUNTING DOWN and are so excited. Yesterday they both kept saying, "I can't wait for tomorrow. I can't wait."
Besides, if you have a good install base, why do you need any further appeal to publishers? And that’s all this would appeal to. Publishers. Sony has more than enough tech from their other divisions to make an incredibly advanced and affordable PS4 that would leave Microsoft in their tracks, so they don’t need to do this.
The basic deal is this: protect the bank’s managers, shareholders and bondholders from any losses, while heaping the socialized losses and risks on the taxpayers and citizens.
Photography is not limited to stills. Videos are great for building walk-throughs and facilities maintenance instructions. Overlays of as-builts can offer a peal away feel to seeing the entire building infrastructure. Whether using technologies like MultiVista, Bluebeam, or similar solutions, the impression made with the owner will keep them loyal to your AEC firm.
Other civilizations do exist.
Nestor, the Long-Eared Christmas Donkey ... ABC Family ... 7 AM
Next up from Saint Arnold will be Saint Arnold Winter Stout, which will begin appearing in stores in early December as supplies of Saint Arnold Christmas Ale are depleted.
Told alternately from the point of view of the guilt-ridden, determined father and his meandering, ruminative son, The Good Father is a powerfully emotional page-turner that keeps one guessing until the very end. This is an absorbing and honest novel about the responsibilities—and limitations—of being a parent and our capacity to provide our children with unconditional love in the face of an unthinkable situation.
All contributions will be double-blind peer reviewed. To facilitate the review process, authors should make an effort to ensure that their identity is not revealed by information contained in their submission. For example, references to a contributor’s work in an abstract should not name the contributor. Instead, for example, replace the author’s proper name by the term “Author”, including any bibliographic data and footnotes. Additionally, paper titles should be removed.
A little before you go to sleep, read something that is exquisite.
Do with that what you will...
all links in place, do not modify the content and
Hope all my blog friends are doing well, have not been able to check your blogs, but will be around soon!
Class: *snickers*
Q. What are you doing to prepare for an upcoming zombie apocalypse and/or the return of Mel Gibson to the silver screen? (Both of which could be terrifying.)
4. Give up your self-defeating self-talk. Oh my. How many people are hurting themselves because of their negative, polluted and repetitive self-defeating mindset? Don’t believe everything that your mind is telling you – especially if it’s negative and self-defeating. You are better than that.
She getting just a bit overweight now she’s getting older. Her daughter graduates HS this year.
I am off to Melkote… and shall write more later.
So, the latest is this set of count and clip cards. The child counts the hearts on each card then clips (using a clothespin clip or anything similar) the correct number along the side. These go from 1 to 12.
5. "I don't see any difference between the races." (You may think you're Ghandi, but you're not.)
21Let me not give respect to any man, or give names of honour to any living.
Here at the P5 it isn't just about Punk and New Wave. While Punk Rock and New Wave was the big scene Downtown, Old Skool Rap and Graffiti culture was starting to emerge Uptown.
SARK says, “It’s about finding and feeling as many glad parts as you can . . .” But it has to start by being willing to feel what you’re feeling.
to looking to Whom my help comes from.
Far from running over her cat, I seduced both her cats, Zoodle and Pywacket. I'd watch her let them out the door at night and coo them over to my hiding place, where I'd stroke their grumbling fur. Her cats were my Trojan horses to carry the smell of the hand I caressed them with back into her house, into her very lap. "
EG and Tony: don’t tell Mrs. Guapo
G&M: Sometimes we like it but not very often. The second course is the best. We like the sandwiches most of all! The worst part is the soup.
1 caused
Miasma: Noxious atmosphere.
1 medium Raw Mango, peeled and grated (Approx. 1 packed cup)
I started writing the lyrics for The Great Depression maybe a decade ago. The title was inspired by something Brad Pitt's character said in Fight Club: "We're the middle children of history, man. No purpose or place. We have no Great War. No Great Depression. Our Great War's a spiritual war... our Great Depression is our lives." At the time that really struck a chord with me, because I was struggling with my own personal depression, and was linking how I felt to wider conditions in society. But when I listened to even some of my favourite artists of the time, though many would go on about feeling sad, isolated and lonely, few would ever ask 'why?' So I decided to do that in a series of lyrics.
It was a beautiful reminder that all of creation holds surprises if we can keep our hearts and minds open to its possibilities. We can be so quick to box and label our days, our seasons, our experiences, and ourselves; how lovely to be stopped in my tracks and have my expectations upended so delightfully.
4 tablespoons mayonnaise
Long awaited, this stunning Sarah Burton creation works for Kate in four key ways: a. The corseted bodice emphasises Kate’s incredible waist, b. the padded hips add feminine curves and add further emphasis to her waist c. The delicate lace complements the sweetheart neckline and covers her up appropriately for the regal ceremony and d. the traditional – yet modest – train and veil make the dress oh-so occasion appropriate. Look-alike tops and dresses are everywhere, but if you want to channel Kate without looking like a demented wannabe bride, choose a black or coloured version such as this Asos dress or H & M’s structured top (on sale!)
I am referring to Team Reels on Wheels and their enormously inspiring undertaking to fish the 2012 World Carp Classic at Lake Bolsena, Italy. It’s a globally recognised competition with fantastic promotional and marketing opportunities for all those involved and these 4 disabled anglers will be representing England and the disabled community in a gruelling 6 days, 5 nights non-stop fishing marathon.
I will accept an ad size of no more than 200x200 pixels. I am pretty flexible with ad shapes and sizes, and I will try to accommodate you to the best of my ability.
over the phone line. Of course she was
/EDIT: forgot to say that the Cornucopia blood bath scene made me dizzy! As if the cameraman is having an epileptic/ seizure while filming that scene! Lol. But seriously, how’s that? I don’t even know what happened to that scene, good thing, I read the book; poor people who haven’t read the book yet, missing half of their lives.
I mean, let's just ignore the fact that the Smiths broke up before I was even born....
Dad asked me what type of books I was looking for and I quickly replied, “Nothing in the incest category.” How odd that I have to include this specification.
Add Zucchini.
What took me by surprise, though, was the absolute abundance, no, super-proliferation, of handcrafted turquoise and silver, in all shapes, sizes and forms, whichever way we turned. Every store window, from our hotel to Santa Fé’s central Plaza and back, lured us in to peer at the jewel-box treasures in hues of aquamarine to cerulean to blue-green and beyond. From belt buckles to arm-bands to bracelets, brooches, rings and earrings. Stones that were pitted or smooth, speckled or plain, fissured or pure, angular or round.
Local Santa Fe Color
Liam went for a neon orange 'mohorn' as he calls it (and I don't want to correct him just yet!), I won't be surprised if it still looks like that when I pick him up - the amount of hair gel, hairspray and hair colour that went in to that hair could sink a ship!
Will the Arab Spring deliver its promises to everyone? Or is there reason to believe that women will be left behind? What has changed for women in the Arab world?
At the Revolution, Torphichen switched sides and actively supported William of Orange by defending the Revolution from Jacobite forces in early 1689. (RPS, 1689/3/82.)
Thank you very much and if you have any questions about anything I might not have covered here, please leave them in the comment section! Below is a photo of some of the awesome staff at Heartland Blood Center in Naperville, Illinois! Thanks Tammy & Chez! And we'll be seeing the other Tammy and Gloria soon when I bring Mr. Manic in for blood later this week!
05. Maneater - Hall & Oates / 4:26
1 fertilization
Blessings and Love to you all.
Dr. Stephanie’s passion is marriage, children, and families. Raised on a Nebraska farm as the oldest of five children, she attributes her strong work ethic to life growing up on the farm. She is no stranger to adversity and attributes her accomplishments to the hard work and perseverance she learned from her own family upbringing. Dr. Stephanie’s parents started Weiland Doors (http://www.weilanddoors.com/), and they role modeled an entrepreunerial spirit that she carries with her to this day.
Some tips to get started:
The new Samsung NX10 is a camera with interchangeable lenses, no mirror reflex, but with an electronic viewfinder. Therefore it incorporates the outline of the Panasonic G1 and GH1, preserving the appearance of a reflex, albeit with a bodiless option and with the electronic viewfinder in the center, above the screen and with a shape similar to the upper cap with a pentaprism SLR.
It was a good thing that I've been hanging around, as it gave me space to remember that there was a casserole in the oven and I've taken it out. No smells emanate from the Aga so there is nothing to remind you when a dish is ready - or overcooked - or burned. Not that it ever burns in the bottom oven, it just sits there getting darker. I was making spag bol for supper - not that I'd dream of calling it spag bol myself of course, it's just to save time typing. I'm not big on abbreviations (and have never shortened university to its first three letters in my life. You knee. Hmph.) and have been known to get quite cross. Apart from sensible ones, obv, darls, y'know what I mean.
Anyway, we've been using some brief breaks in the rain to start sorting through the jungle that is our land. Help has arrived in the shape of a couple of helpXers from Arizona who are also into permaculture. Broad beans are in full production, hmmm my favourite, and the first wild strawberries are ripe:
So just please just forgive yourself already, I finally have, it is only then your healing can begin.
I can't worry about the big picture. All I can do is what I can do right now. And right now all I can do for this baby girl is give her a safe, warm place to grow.
This movie is stupid! Everything about it is horrible. It makes the other ones I’ve reviewed look like masterpieces in comparison. Hellraiser: Bloodline? More like Hellraiser: Bled Out. There was no coherency here – it was a big mess of epic proportions. I mean, even if I’m supposed to take it that this was intended to be the very last Hellraiser film ever, and no one had plans to do any more, it’s still a giant pile of suck. The meager 85-minute runtime is padded out to ridiculous levels with nonsense like Pinhead’s speeches, the garbage with Angelique doing stuff despite her storyline going nowhere in the end and of course the scenes of the military guys hiding from the cenobites – seriously, it’s worthless. Padding so fluffed up it might as well be thicker than the actual substance of the movie.
Today is the first real day of spring. I think it's absolutely wonderful, I'd forgotten how much I missed experiencing the changing seasons. I've been living with Dan for three-ish weeks already. It's funny how well we're getting along, and I wonder what will happen when his parents come visit and I start traveling. Somewhere deep in the recesses of my imagination, I'm harbouring thoughts of genuinely wanting to develop this relationship further. I don't know why, it just feels like it'll be worth it. The fact that he's poly-amourous and shared the same sentiment as I do about multiple partners probably has something to do with making me more open to the idea. To other people it might seem like an unwillingness to commit, perhaps it is that, but from my vantage point, I see it as being able to let go of a petty, negative feeling. But I won't go on about it.
(2) Nirvana, to my way of understanding, means permanent enlightenment and that to me means sahaja nirvikalpa samadhi. What we will experience may be no higher than Brahmajnana or God-Realization. The lesser event happens when the kundalini reaches the seventh chakra and results in a temporary heart opening. The greater event happens when the kundalini doubles back on the hridayam or spiritual heart and results in a permanent heart opening. Much about the stages of enlightenment is fully explained here: http://www.angelfire.com/space2/light11/fdl/e1.html The whole dictionary to be found at that URL is on enlightenment.
team members – Fisher Grant, Sam Duggan, Kieran Grant & Luke Marks
Belt - form Karen
The men tuck in. I know this because in hot weather, they immodestly remove their blazers. The gleaming of their shoes could illuminate a sketchy intersection. Suits, suits are everywhere – and, unlike in San Francisco, it isn’t drag. Pink button-downs abound, but their wearers seem straight as an arrow. The men sport crew cuts. No curls or artistically-arranged facial hair here (I’m still talking about men, now).
It's not enough to allow our readers to live vicariously through our characters. We need to make our stories so engaging that when readers finish them, they get up and go have the same experiences themselves: travel to a distant location and explore the location on foot, or plant a garden or make your own clothes like our pioneer ancestors. But most importantly, ask questions, especially "why" and "how."
After the escape in Brazil, Bruce decides he needs to come north to the United States and he goes to his old stomping grounds. He sees Betty but doesn’t approach her. Instead, he goes to his old pizza shop hangout and gets the owner, Stanley, to let him crash upstairs for a bit. Stanley is played by Paul Soles, who voiced Bruce Banner in the 1960s cartoon. Before long, Bruce walks out of the kitchen when Betty and her new boyfriend, Leonard Samson (Ty Burrell), are visiting. Betty sees him and chases Bruce down, taking him to the house she shares with Samson.
In Coron
Well, I’m not a photo journalist, and I’m a little shy when it comes to taking pictures of random strangers. However, when I was in Portland last summer, I challenged myself a little, and got out of my comfort zone…and tried a little “street photography”.
2 sons
His head snapped around as if he could feel her probe. She cursed her curiosity as his piercing cobalt gaze locked with hers. Something shifted in his appearance, a mask of the mind that she couldn’t see past. Almost as if her eyes saw one thing and her mind another. Meal or nay, now that she had the information she sought, she should
KEARNS — Simon Cho was 70 points ahead going into the final race of the U.S. Championships Sunday afternoon.
Yeah, what the fuck, right? Errol was born two Mondays ago, and he's doing well. If you'll look at the post 2 prior to this one, I mention that I was sick-- turned out it was morning sickness. Haha very funny, life! (And when Jim asked if I was trapped under something heavy, pretty much, yeah :p
Mike Fuller Letter to Us:
As I listened to the radio this morning, the reporter announced that the Guantanamo prisoners would be facing the tribunal beginning tomorrow. Having always thought that the Obama Administration would use these trials as a key re-election strategy, I thought it is time to begin a series of posts discussing Mr. Obama's re-election stunts.
sitting, where i’ve sat many nights before
Instead, we have a film that has the feels like a precursor of the Spaghetti Western, with evil banditos laying siege to and menacing innocent farmers. The settlement is even protected by a palisade that looks a little bit like an old west fort.
I’ve saved her life, as for me, She is making mine complete.
The risen Saviour shines upon you!
Like many English majors, I was brainwashed in college against reading any genre fiction. Growing up as a reader has involved letting go of that arbitrary prejudice and learning to enjoy a variety of genres: in the last year alone I've read a fantasy, a mystery, several YAs, and a thriller. Excellent writing exists across genres, and the tagline “literary” is no guarantee of artistic merit, much less reading enjoyment. This week, I’m delighted to introduce our readers to Gabi Stevens, author of the Time of Transition series, classified as “paranormal romance” and described by one Amazon reviewer as “a mix between contemporary romance and Harry Potter.” (Ms. Stevens has also kindly offered a book giveaway: see end for details.)
The king for 1000 years-Keeper of the seven keys Pt.III Legacy
Now to show you some of Michelle's images by our amazing DT. Hope this inspires you to create and let your imagination run wild.
Think of one small object in your house to which you are emotionally attached, something that you love for some intangible reason, something that would seem not valuable and ordinary to most any one else. Can you identify and describe why that object is important to you? Why did you save it in the first place, and what keeps you from tossing it with the next yard sale or round of spring cleaning? If you are like me, you have many objects that fall into that category.
No doubt you have seen these stylistic, bold, floral paintings before and heard the name Kim Parker. You may have even seen The Rug Company rugs that bore her designs. Since 2010, when Kim launched her own label, the rugs have been available through Kim Parker Home along with several other home furnishing items bearing her signature designs. I am a little slow to the game, because I just stumbled across this site and it's offerings, so in case, like me you are not "in the know," you can now consider yourself informed!
Folks, I am here to tell you that there is a reason why the republican tent is so small. Trust me when I tell you that they kind of like it that way. I will give you that this was the late eighties, but still, if looks could kill I wouldn't be here today. I don't care how much progress wingnuts claim they have made, you will never catch my black ass at such an event again. Ever!
We are so desperate to know. In knowing, there is an illusion of control. In the New Testament era, in knowing someone’s name there was a belief that one held power over another. You see it when the demons Jesus encountered claimed, “I know who you are, Jesus the holy one of God!” We feel safer and even more powerful when we think we have control, or simply know what to expect. Men become workaholics because managing the office world makes them feel powerful and important as they manage the workload and predict trends and trials. Moms will allow their lives to become consumed by their children because they find value and worth in shaping the lives of their kids and in who their kids become. We fall into our ruts and rat-races because its easier to manage than an unknown…and since God’s ways are not like ours, the Christian life – following Jesus – is full of unknowns.
J.
“Mommy,” he says. He has recognized me! I will have to serve him now.
The people that value you.
In a terse one-line statement, the committee said the decision was not unanimous. “The committee decided to reduce the Selic rate to 9.75 per cent per annum … by five votes to two votes,” it said.
Today America is about to end as we know it, for we Americans are nothing more than poor complainers with chips on our shoulders. We have all become NATIONAL JERKS.
Although he harassed Jason Kidd’s family, harassing communication was not pursued as a charge to be convicted and sentenced in a court of law, because the investigator stated that the perpetrator made a threat to his wife which is third party.
I'll continue to wear the beanie though .
I am surprisingly upset about this. Horses come and go all the time at our facility, it's just part of the rehab and conditioning process. It doesn't affect me in the slightest, and even if I particularly liked the horse (I work with them 5, 6, or 7 days a week depending, so they tend to get more attention on the whole than Bay Girl does from me), the most I ever think when they leave is "aw, bye horsey." But not Bay Girl. When we found out the owner is taking her to a different place, my heart sank. That is less than a month away. I've been a bit back and forth about the process... should I stop playing with her and wean myself off of her so I don't get so upset when she leaves? (And let her wean herself off of me.... she surely will not be getting half as much attention anywhere else that she goes). Or should I try to squeeze in as much time with her as possible?
Book Review =C
Finally, RSDW, take off that fucking hat. You look like one of those fucking hipsters who spends hours trying to look effortlessly cool. If I cared enough to do something about it, I would bum some paint thinner from one of the artists and a lit cigarette from those shitty smokers and burn your hat in front of you while you cry and scream for the homeland. But that's not even the worst of it. It's chilly and I'm wearing the one long-sleeved shirt I have with me. I look fine by myself, but next to you, I appear to be the retarded relative you took out on the weekly visitation. And for that, I will shit inside of your soul. Cunt.
And I think I might have inspired some ladies to run out and buy some new tools to add to their collections. Now doesn't that sound successful to you? Learning, Laughter and New Toys?
It's not that I don't want to talk to the people/friends on my messenger its just that I can't at the moment hold the conversation that they want me to hold. So this morning in error I signed on as available (why do the messenger setting change of their own accord) and on first glance there was to my relief no one on line. So with great cunning and speed I change my Status to invisible. Oh! but there is always someone who is on line like me, invisible obviously avoiding people on their lists for some reason.
If these businesses are viable, they should be getting the money privately. The government’s involvement merely crowds out private lenders and transfers risk to Canadian taxpayers.
Instead of using my treadmill, why did I watch three hours of TV yesterday then watch a movie?
I believe there is a noticeable difference in mom when she is not taking the coconut oil. Initially I thought perhaps it was just a coincidence that the dementia seemed to worsen when she wasn’t taking it. But now, I really think there is a direct correlation.
My novella, PIERCING THROUGH THE DARKNESS, is based on a college student named Kandi with repressed memories of a tragic accident she’s had. Her family took her to see a psychiatrist who tried hypnosis to recover the memories, but it didn’t take. So, they had to pretend like nothing ever happened to her. She has this huge secret what could potentially kill her, and she doesn’t even know it. Her best friend, Jimmy, has to protect her, and when the man who’s out for revenge threatens her life, he feels like there isn’t anything he can do to protect her. The novella is told in three different people’s point of view, and as we follow them through the story, it’s all about these characters finding their way through the darkness that is figuratively surrounding them.
Therefore the Master remains
Gary’s Marketplace has 3 locations all with a very nice selection of wine, beer, and great staff. That said, If your ever in the Bernardsville NJ area looking for a great bottle of wine look no further and ask for Troy, he’ll help you out!
But I believe I've found the key;
The flowers were colored with the Evergreen Collection and the floral center were colored with the very lightest shade from the Poppy Collection, blended with the clear blender pen and then the centers were colored with the two lightest colors from the Sunflower Collection. I used the Blossom Spellbinders die and Classic Circle Nestabilities die (cut thanks to my Grand Calibur) to cut both my clock face out and then mat it up. After embossing the Blossom die cut, I did take a sanding block and sand the edges. Add some ribbon a fun brad and a sentiment from the Moment in Time set and... ta da!!!! Easy peasy lemon squeezy! You can see, I did add some razzle dazzle with the help of some glitter glue.
I could say that Halloween marks the beginning of a series of holiday events that will lead us, ultimately, into and through the New Year, when the world is cold and dead and we await the new life of Spring.
And that’s it! Hopefully you’ll love your table as much as I do. I also made one for my sister as a house warming gift and she adores it. The best part of the table is that it is unique and has a story of it’s own to tell. Here’s a front view of the table.
The lyrics are as fresh as a daisy. I know of no better lyricist in show-business than Mr. Sondheim — his words are a joy to listen to, even when his music is sending shivers of indifference up your spine. The man is a Hart in search of a Rodgers, or even a Boito in search of a Verdi.
Business expenses: Any unavoidable business expenses incurred during the month aka: lab costs, PPA membership, postage, etc. (does not include non-required business purchases, such as props).
shHHH…shhHH… (I can’t recreate sound of Breaks more superiorly)
But do you know what men don’t like? When we order daintily only to stare at and eventually start eating off their plates. If you want chips, order your own freaking chips. Don’t pretend you’re going in for one only to eat half.
I don’t see it that way, I see the State of Israel as a state, a Jewish one (whatever that means), as I see Denmark as a Christian state, both being secular, but both giving a special place for Judaism and Christianity respectively as the main religions, but not the only religions. Neither do I see the State of Israel as the beginning of redemption, though I certainly pray for its wellbeing, as I did and still do with Denmark, and for the whole humankind. For example, when I pray the ‘Birkat HaMazon,’ the prayer said after eating bread, the Koren Siddur, which I use, has the addition of blessing Israel being the beginning of the Redemption, which I have used as title for this post, though this is in no way standard for the most Siddurim. This addition I don’t pray, though I do pray for the wellbeing of the soldiers in IDF, who are ‘standing guard’ over Israel.
There's been a lot of talk on the interwebs of late about anxiety. I'm looking forward to reading Kerri Sackville's forthcoming book (out May) about the subject because if it's as funny as her Facebook status updates on the subject we're in for a treat.
Thanks for stopping by! I'm goin' to workout, and then watch American Idol to cheer on Hailey Reinhart!! She is from my town!! Who is your favorite remaining AI contestant? I also like James :-)
Or does it explode?
Fuck!!!!!
We adopted a new dog two days ago, after our beloved old dowager Sammy died a few weeks ago. I didn't realise just how much a part of the family she was until she was no more. We'd had her since the youngest was 2 ... and he's now 15.
Anyway, son, I’ve done a whole lot of talking today. Now it’s your turn. Don’t be shy! What will it take for you to sign these papers and enlist today?
I had high hopes for THE CURSE OF THE BLACK SPOT because the commercials and above prequel revealed this to be a pretty gorgeous looking episode. We’ve got pirates, a pirate ship, a becalmed ocean, fog, heavy moonlight, a glowing bluish-green siren, and Amy as a Pirate. Unfortunately, when the best thing you can say about an episode is that Amy looks hot as a pirate … yeah, duh. I need more than that and BLACK SPOT doesn’t deliver.
La Bonne Soupe is true to its name; it focuses on soup. (Owners Jean-Paul and Monique Picot took the bistro's name from a French comedy playwright Félicien Marceau from the 1950s.) Though there are plenty of other things on the menu, the centerpiece are four daily soups, including French Onion, which are served with bread, salad, dessert and (of course) a glass of wine, all for $16.75.
As an adult, marriage, work and raising two sons took priority. And while I fell madly in love with reading romance, there wasn’t much time to write it. It’s amazing how much corporate life, soccer games, high school musicals, dinner and laundry can suck out of the average day. But I would occasionally dabble in writing, then put it aside when I got busy. Unfortunately, I was always busy.
God had other plans. Instead, I don’t even remember waking up to my early phone alarm, but only to wake an hour and a half later on my own. I feel and look to where my phone is usually kept, but it’s nowhere. I feel and search around my bed, underneath the pillows, underneath my blankets, but it’s nowhere. I quickly jump out of bed, turn on my light to search high and low for my phone, but it’s nowhere. Heart beating faster and faster, worry comes over me, did I throw it somewhere? Did I talk to someone half asleep on the phone? Was I angry because the alarm went off?
um.. well, no..after the 20 questions about "now, why are you having this done" and not fully understanding the concept of the band they call the radiologist.. (really?) . Then the tech goes on to tell me I dont look like I need a tummy tuck..
Six Feet Under, “Tears, Bones & Desire” — Season 3
We see this a ton in fantasy manuscripts but hey, it's not limited to that genre. Recently, I've seen this structure in a lot of young adult samples we've been reading.
-Brandon-
Richie
My Knit Picks order, which is funny. I took this photograph because my coworker and I always joke how we place and order and a day or two later get the new catalog, with something new and exciting. This shipment actually arrived WITH the new catalog.
5. I’m adopted and am 98% sure I have a twin. My mother was Marilyn Monroe. She stopped by Wheeling in 1956 and gave birth to me. You’d be surprised at the resemblance. I’m sure the stories are true.
Pre-Readers: Picture books /pop up books Ages:0-5
Just as Jesus refused to be boxed in by the cultural expectation that he was only a “carpenter” let us also breakaway from the concept that we are only “laity”. We need to recognize that we, each of us, constitute the body of Christ and each of us is called to specifically manifest the person of Christ in whatever role or profession we may be involved in this world. The distinguishing mark of a disciple is that we love as Jesus loves (Jn 13:34-35). Only the Holy Spirit working in us can accomplish this – for it is not our work but His. This the essence and purpose for the Crucified Life.
Unnecessary words can bog your sentences down. I want to glide through prose, not wade through it. If I have to stop and process what’s being said, I’m being pulled out of the story.
Both players score the value of enemy elements that are lost. The winning player also scores a 12 point bonus.
If so, I should take inventory of my life (my time, money, talents, etc.)
The next sketch is made by Claire, her first on this blog and you can find that sketch at the end of this post.
This time it is my turn( Ria) to set a challenge and I choose to do a recipe to challenge. So I would like to see you use just 1 Stamped Image, 2 Embellishments, 3 Design papers and as extra some faux or real stitching on your Artwork.
Oh, how I wanted to draw!
Yes, reaching my dreams is still uncertain. Yes, I always go back to square one when I’m living with my parents (forced dependence inside the “Laguna prison”). Yes, I’m jealous of all my batchmates who, at this stage, are either employed at some big company or are enrolled for law school. But those are not reasons to sit around and count crows. I may not be ready for uncertainty, but I’m ready to at least push until my efforts bear fruit.
hand packaged.
Butt turned up at the scene on Parr Lane, Unsworth, Greater Manchester, at 11.30am on October 21 last year, shortly after his brother was taken away by police.
None of us can, please believe me, and if perhaps you think you are, I'm sure there is a slack somewhere. And more than likely that slack will be found in the amount of sleep you're getting Mom. Not good.
Let’s catch up on the background. Paul is in Jerusalem speaking to a great crowd of angry Jews; angry, because Paul was not doing what they thought he should be doing. They were jealous because he was going to the Gentiles without their blessing. It was only by the grace of God that he was now able to speak to them. In his message he was showing them that God gave him this commission.
In Pakistan, Asia International Finance Company Limited, a leading Chinese business group, recently invested $40 million in KASB Finance Limited, a holding company of KASB group. That deal was also claimed as the first ever investment by a Chinese company inPakistan’s financial services sector.
Cream together butter, cream cheese and egg yolk. Add orange juice, zest and extract. Add dry cake mix. Stir in currants, walnuts and basil. Drop by teaspoons onto buttered cookie sheet. Bake in 350 degree oven for 12-15 minutes. Cool on wire rack. Yield: 4 dozen.
I would however like to add my latest cards. (just in case some lonely web surfer somewhere out there, stumbles across my blog .......
The police of course will use the stat of the cop death to justify drawing their guns quicker, & using SWAT raids more.
So what does this have to do with clothing? Well, the first staple we talked about is your wide shot. If you have the right suit, all the details we addressed will fade into the background and just give off the presentation of a well-made, well-fitting suit.
And so we come finally the story of the movie. Its obvious Seve Schelenz as a precise idea what he wants to be shown, and yet the presentation of the story is both the movies strength and the ultimate weakness of this movie. People will watch this movie and adore everything, the reveal at the end will get them talking, and theories will be talked about days after. It may seem simple to begin with but to really delve into the richness of the story you have to do the work yourself, this movie doesn’t hold your hand and doesn’t serve up answers easily. Yet at what point does a film move from being subtle with its answers and just being frustrating? Thinking of this movie in reference to the mass audience, I can see people getting to the end and hating the movie.
Maybe I need to use Craig's List. Yeah, I'll hire someone to figure out what the fuck this pile of paper says and translate it into legible notes.
2 T chopped chives
Autoeczematization (or autosensitization) is a reaction pattern in which eczematous disease elsewhere on the skin induces “metastatic” eczematous lesions at some distant spot. The hands, particularly the palms and fingers, are frequently involved in this reaction. A vesicular component that resembles dyshidrosis is often expose. A diagnosis of autoeczematization is likely: (1 ) if vesiculation is explosive in onset, (2) if there is minimal grouping of the vesicles, and most importantly, (3) when marked eczematous disease is found on the feet or elsewhere on the body.
This whole week has been a whirlwind full of things, things, and more things. On the writing front, I'm closing in on 23,000 words of my new novel (which fills me with SUCH glee), but...this post is about dancing! And on Tuesday night we had what was our best, most amazing, most energetic tribal expo yet! If you're friends with me on facebook (WHAT? You're not? :( Friend me?) you've probably seen the pictures I posted.
Bizzarre overpricing
The premier told a talk radio audience Thursday the amendment “protects parent’s’ rights.”
Months ago on any given Thursday morning, I’d have been sitting at my desk, tackling hundreds of e-mails, fighting the incessant fires of accounting and service delivery problems, and planning to face the bumper to bumper, hot honking black fumes traffic of Accra.
Quickly she drifted off falling into dreams.
Heat up pot and put in some vegetable oil. Sauté onions and garlic until golden brown. Add in cinnamon stick, star anise and cloves. Stir fry for a short while. Put in the curry, fennel, turmeric and cumin paste. Pour some water into the pot; add the egg plant and dhall beans. Bring to a boil and turn the heat to low. Let it simmer for around 1 hour. Add carrot, tomato, long beans and potato. Bring to a boil and let it simmer for another 10 minutes. Pour in the tamarind juice and add salt to taste. Serve with roti chanai, rice, puri, chapati or plain bread.
* schreiben - to write. ich schreibe, du schreibst, er schreibt. ich schrieb. ich habe geschrieben.
But they’ve run into resistance from fellow dog owners and the run’s unofficial caretaker. It is also unclear which city agency is responsible for the waterfront property that Bugsy’s Dog Run sits on.
"..very acute concern among Conservatives that the party's position was being watered down".
So today, after my child did one more "muuum?" I just had to go to my bathroom, lock the door, put a towel in my face, pressed my fingers in my ears and had myself a long good cry.
A couple of warbands, in this case historical opponents not really from a fantasy world.
. . . the quote below - this describes me completely.
Darth Spoilboy over the course of the entire Christmas break brought up the fact that he had wanted to keep those toy soldiers. Now I mean no harm about this but my wife is not the sentimental type, if anything she is far more Vulcan than Spock when it comes to getting rid of anything she feels is useless and just taking up space. God help me, but there have been more than a few times she has given me a very curious look like she was contemplating the logic in kicking me out onto the street so I told my son to just suck it up.
I'm ready to meet our new addition. :)
I'm actually writing this in a German newspaper office, because I didn't bring the right kind of plug converter to use with my little portable computer. So I'm using a German keyboard, and the Z is where the Y should be and vice versa. You never realize how many Ys you use until you start seeing Zs all over the place.
CHAPTER 3: Handles
Each mile a leap,
Warning: Gross Baby Poop story to follow.
On a totally unrelated note, I'm feeling a little tipsy. Where are the caviar puffs? WAITER!
The aforementioned toddler is quickly approaching the 3rd anniversary of her birth. (hold me)
6. Strengthen public institutions
I was surprised to discover last year that Bangladesh is not a particularly unequal place. But if we take that data at face value — and I see no reason to think that the statisticians are grossly, fundamentally getting Bangladesh wrong — then Strukhoff’s finding shouldn’t come as a surprise.
Yet another witness claims that Joyce was seen with the leadpiping, heading towards the Study, where Stuart Andrew was reading with his back to the door and his ears covered by mufflers, so they didn’t get cold.
If you are from the UK (or from anywhere elsewhere in the world), it seems very wise to me not only to consult a specialist who understands your “origin” situation, but also to consult a Belgian specialist as you will find out that inheritance law can be very different from country to country and this might actually result in having to draft not one will that covers all your assets but a will in each country where you have assets may be helpful.
We are now stuck in a holding pattern until our own government gives us permission to have our children. They are ours. They bear our name. They are no longer considered orphans in Ethiopia because they have parents (Us!). Yet the US Embassy will not allow them travel authorization to enter the country and live with us in Kentucky. There are many who are saying the State Department is opposed to international adoptions on ideological grounds. Thus, they are intentionally derailing or at least detaining adoptions. I don’t know for sure what is happening. But I do know we are waiting.
On December 15, 1911 King George v laid the foundation stone for New Delhi. Now 100 years after its inception the national capital of Delhi has overspilled its boundaries and has layers within layers. On one hand it is aggressive competitive energetic and violent and on the other vibrant colorful seeped in nostalgia and old world charm.
Heavy-handed shit, like a roller coaster ride, has obvious cues such as big explosion and exciting dum dum dum music to make you feel afraid or excited intuitively. Sure, these feelings are only temporary and empty but that temporary moment is definitely gratifying. Heavy-handed shits are always exciting if you go with their flow and not get annoyed by the fact that they are treating you like an idiot by telling you how you should feel.
Favorite? I had a lot of them in my creative life. At first the idea is born in my head, it sits there for some time and then when the time is right I start to create and get totally involved into the process. My husband complains sometime that I am not there with him when I sew. I love fabric ( to the point that I can get almost sick from the excitement of being in a good fabric shop).
Grey Knit Vest $39.99 from Gap Outlet
Those few gifts I know that when my boys open them their eyes will light up with excitement.
B-Front, Zany, Alpha Twins, Ran-D & Adaro.. What can I say? Thank you for bringing the house down. Hard, raw, euphoric, it was all represented by these passionate artists. I never get tired of hearing their music. It gets me pumped every single time.
Sfameni SF, Skurrie IJ, Gilbert GL. Antenatal screening for congenital infection with rubella, cytomegalovirus and toxoplasma. Aust NZ J Obstet Gynaecol 1986; 26: 257-260.
I have been remiss again. So much for retirement from the work force, I seem to be busier than ever with trivial distractions.
THE GUY WAS A MIDGET.
1/2 teaspoon baking soda
Here they are in their new set up. I thought about having them in the family room with us, but quickly realized that our nosy Gracie might tip the whole thing over trying to look in. So I ended up putting the tub in our "office" on a wooden trunk where she can't get to them.
I have to ask you to forgive me. If there was a reason for filling Saturday’s blog with an unforgivable level of the black stuff, it was my exhaustion after two days in Manchester.
Yep. I've kept silent about it, but today (in)courage tagged me in a Facebook post, so I guess my anonymity flew the coop.
You may find that things are much better than you thought.And wild applause as he nails the dismount.
He was spotted in 1900 by a William Morris agent in St. Louis and thence booked for the Orpheum and Keith circuits. From 1900-14, he crisscrossed the globe many times, performing not only in Europe but also in such far flung place as Australia and South Africa (which is where he first met Will Rogers). In these years, he literally played before the Crowned Heads of Europe, further adding to the Fields mystique. During the years of the world tour he became a dumb act, to avoid the difficulties of the language barrier. While a non-verbal Fields may seem difficult to imagine, one must keep in mind what an adept physical comedian he was. He was a first rate pantomimist, and that skilled was honed during these years.
As always with patent claims, not to mention advertisements proffering dubious ‘guarantees’, for even more dubious ‘miracle cures’, it is important to pay attention to the precise wording: in this case ‘practised and applied’, ‘in the courts of this country’, ‘where appropriate’, ‘settled jurisprudence’. Terrell is not just unapologetically Anglo-centric, it is almost entirely court-centred. Unlike The Modern Law of Patents, in particular, Terrell has no pretensions as a source of reference for patent office practitioners (whether in Newport or Munich), and the Munich case law is expressly included for its relevance to UK law and practice, rather than for its intrinsic importance. Does all this mean that Terrell's editors have failed to deliver on what they promised? I think not, since Terrell holds up a faithful mirror to what has been the policy of the Patents Court since the days of Falconer and Aldous JJ, both editors of Terrell themselves. They (and Terrell) have done their best to see that English law has marched to the same tune as European law, but not to the extent of slavishly following in anyone else's footsteps.
Advice: Remember what I said about getting medical attention when needed. Consult your doctor about any conditions you are not comfortable with.
Amanda:"I absent my save file."
Nowadays having a husband helps to guarantee I get a card, at least I will if he realises the mistake that early morning twitter comment is! But it was his comment that possibly a tweet would make up for no card made me think....
The trouble with the facial board can be dealt with maybe in the warmer weather as it will not cause any more problems for a long time.
Here’s the problem – a lot of this stuff was already on Poincare’s notes and manuscripts – actually a really really really lot of it! Some say that is proof of nothing because Einstein was a genius, the man of the century, and incidentally he was a sex maniac for what it’s worth. Einstein insisted he never read other scientists papers, that it muddied his thought process and was counterproductive to original thought. Here’s the thing, Einstein belonged to an organization known as the Olympia Academy, and what they studied often and at great depth was Poincare.
When a man will offer me
Here’s where you come in! I need topics! Have you ever wondered what this demon’s view was on something? Did you ever think there might be a different way of looking at something. Do you want to know my deepest darkest secrets concerning the show or the books? Well, here’s your chance!
I am today saddened because good friends are moving away from LA again…on Friday. I also learned that another friend will be moving away in June. She is taking some items home during the Christmas Holiday and will complete the school year. She will then move into the home she’s already purchased…in another state.
Ink: Real Red, Garden Green, Early Espresso, Rich Razzleberry, Chocolate Chip, Marina Mist, Daffodil Delight, Pretty in Pink
It was the summer of 1967. My parents had taken my brother and me to Tiger Stadium in Downtown Detroit to enjoy America’s favorite pastime, baseball. As best as I can recall, it was a great day at the old ballpark.
On reading the situation of the coming US plans for Total Global War, Putin spelt out an alliance to integrate the former Soviet Republics into closer cooperation. He scheduled an emergency trip to China to meet with Hu, and ordered the FSB (Russian Agency) to notify China’s MSS of the arrest and detention of their spy Tun Sheniyun who was captured last year for attempting to steal sensitive information on Russia’s most powerful anti-aircraft system.
I would call each of you who read this BLOG today to stop what you’re doing and pray. Pray for your family, those you work with, your church. Pray for protection and peace and that we would be surrounded by a host of heavenly messengers. Pray for our country and our leaders. Prayer is our offensive weapon and we should target the local covens during these days. We should take care to pray especially for those pastors who are unaware of what is lurking in their own communities. Finally, we should be on guard, for our enemy goes about like a roaring lion seeking whom me may destroy. The battle is real and we must learn to engage! PRAY!
The Trinity is not the Trinity because of us. The Trinity has been and always will be. We are what we are because the Trinity has willed it so.
I have realized that I need to write a better explanation of what I teach since my current class description is a "just the facts Mam", bare bones blurb. So I thought I would do a write up here that can be pared down for advertising.
Sehun‘s tactics were similar to Chanyeol’s, as he was cast in elementary school, went through two years of auditions, and finally started training in his second year of junior high. He went through four final years of training before his debut.
Ava
info@theexhibitionlab.com
06 - Nostalgias de un Amor (3:25)
We could start with allowing backyard chickens.
You know, if we ever speak again, that is. /lolsob/
Obviously I like a little color for a workspace! I think it's fun and cheerful and can make working more of a pleasure...it's the little things, right? So, what are your workspace essentials? What do you keep on your desk? Are you particular about how everything looks?
The latest "Confidence Trick" employed by the bigoted Smokerphobics backed by Govt is expected to launch a public consultation on plain packaging later this month which is a smoke screen con trick to pretend the public is actually involved in a decision that is already made.
See the Bedouin fires at night
7pm – Dinner & drinks
After holiday indulgences, I was ready for some healthy soup. Something hot and filling. I must mention here that our downstairs heater decided not to work on this day so cooking was a good way to stay warm. We do have a wood burning fireplace and thank goodness we had some wood. The downstairs was hovering in the 50 degree range for which I am thankful. It was not the same temperature as outside. It was cold and it was snowing which by default makes one colder and it was the day after Christmas and we were getting snowed in and I had already cooked enough. Seriously.
I found a shoulder to lean on
We tell about this in such detail, because the expectation is at the heart of every game situation. When the bookie calls from football fans bet $ 11 to win $ 10, he has a positive expectation of 50 cents per its $ 10. When the casino pays even money for your blackjack when the dealer’s ace, it has a positive expectation about $ 3.85 with rates of $ 100 as of 13 surrenders blackjack dealer will happen 4 times and 9 times does not happen. Paying your 1:1 13 times casinos will lose $ 1300, and playing 4 times a draw and paying your Blackjack 9 times 3:2, it will lose $ 1350. In 13 similar games save $ 50! A roulette casino in every game Belarus pays you 1 / 37 of your stake in the room! With 37-rooms of the roulette wheel to doyles room poker rakeback, it pays you instead of just 35:1 36:1. And the quiet lives of these 2,7%.
With Song critique session first half, followed by Guest Speaker: Songsalive! holds workshops where songwriters gather to share their songs, gain feedback and develop relationships within the songwriting communities we have created around the world. The first half is solely dedicated to an in-the-round workshop where writers present one song each - either on tape, CD or live followed by a guest speaker/industry discussion in the second half and plenty of time to talk and network. Moderated by Paul Lawrence Moyer.
The aircraft, with a payload capacity of 124 tons, will be used by Etihad Cargo to transport fresh produce, machinery and garments on routes to and from Africa, Europe, India and China over the Abu Dhabi hub. Delivery and commencement of operations are scheduled for June 2012.
Bobo Ren(Bobo. You're going with an alias - that HAS to be an alias - and the best that you can come up with is Bobo? Was Noogie or Froo-Froo taken?)
AMMON C. a public health approach to improve the vaccination coverage against influenza amongst healthcare workers. Abstract Second European Influenza Conference 2005: S4-2.
In another interview you said that your music was a way to commune with the unknown and unexplained. What exactly has that entailed for you?
Perhaps in Washington we are too busy to notice this turning point in the season. Who knows? In 21st century America, we are cut off from the agricultural cycle in every way. No wonder we don't tune in to the energy of the moment.
Z rolled out of bed begging to 'go somewhere', so I bundled up the kids and took them with me. I had decided to be a volunteer, so we were going at 9:30. (Volunteers get to split up the extras!) The distribution happens at a park, so I figured it was win win. Play time for the kids. Extra veggies for me. Sweet!
Once cooked, quinoa is a blank canvas and you can get as creative as you like by adding fresh herbs, diced veggies, beans, crumbled cheese, nuts, dried fruit, etc.
Thanks for the great run. It will always be a special time to me.
I still like the price mechanism. Why not a pub smoking tax? Establishments that allow smoking would pay a per-seat premium to the state for that privilege (funds to be used to pay for education and health programs related to smoking). Further I think smoking establishments should be required to provide full health insurance benefits to all employees, even part-timers, and maybe a wage premium, too.
In the light American lager catagory, I think this might be the best entry of them all. Light amber color with a slight amount of head. There is a nice hop flavor but not overwhelming like an IPA or APA. There was also a hint of caramel flavor. This was such a refreshing and clean tasting beer. It can easily be drank a few at a time with no issues.
Second, the conscious destruction of fatherhood. While not all of these rioters come from broken homes — yes, the term is most applicable — many of them have no strong, male figure to look to, and even when a father is present he is often emasculated. We have lionized the single mother and made the role of the dad who provides boundaries and consequences to actions a figure of fun, a dinosaur.
Yeah yeah yeah I know, I should speak to someone about that / sort my shit out / unfuck myself over but that is a helluva lot harder than just buying the wood to make a bridge.
Another day, I was on the phone, trying to write down what PhoneMan was delivering to me when suddenly, a tourist walked into the store. My phone began to slip from my face. He was a deluxe tourist. His hair was inky black and pulled back in a greasy ponytail with a rubber band. His beard was long and white like Santa Clause, which matched his physique perfectly. He had many pens stuffed in his man-breast pocket, which left little pools of ink on his pit-stained polo-shirt. The most magnificent thing about him was his fanny pack that had not one, but TWO cup holders. He was waving a rusty bayonet haphazardly through the air while smiling like he had just brought me something I was really going to enjoy. I ignored him and asked PhoneMan to repeat his question.
This marks the first Christmas video release from the iconic Travis, who launched his career in 1986 with the triple-Platinum-selling CD, Storms of Life. His 1987 follow-up, Always & Forever, went on to sell five million copies, cementing his position in country music history as he went on to become the first country music artist to achieve multi-Platinum status. Travis has released 20 albums total including two Christmas albums, 2007’s Songs of The Season and 1989’s Gold-selling An Old Time Christmas. His most recent release, Around The Bend, hit streets in July of this year, debuting at #3 on Billboard’s Country chart and #14 on the Albums chart.
I will make a set of two custom bag-tags for two winners. I can make tags for boys or girls, and the giveaway is open internationally. All you need to do is leave a comment with a back-to-school tip or hint. Giveaway ends at midnight on the 31st January. Goodluck!!
Whenever people have asked me if I've read David Copperfield I've always said yes, but never felt easy about doing so: it feels like part of my psyche - especially my writing psyche - but it's so long since I read it, and I was only a child, surely it can hardly count; surely if I read it again I'd find it a completely different experience from the one I remember?
curiouslee: I stick with OLPC because of the interesting people I meet.
Let’s put ourselves back in Abraham’s family’s shoes….They did not know about Abraham’s intentions the day he was to sacrifice his son. Let’s now imagine that somebody followed him to the mountain and see what he is about to do…. How would that person react? How would you react?
As people who enjoy fitness and a healthy lifestyle, we all know some days are better than others. Most days are great. We are inclined to eat healthy and going to workout is almost second nature. We relish the fact that we can push our bodies to new heights continuously and love the way we feel afterward. There are also those days we don’t feel as motivated and we “try” to workout. In the words of the old and wise Yoda, “Do or do not, there is no try”.
"I'll just have some green tea and a sit down first", I thought. Then looked at the TV Times while drinking said tea and found that the "Young musician of the year" semi final was on, and that was the end of that.
There have been a few events this month that have left me feeling proud, honored, excited, motivated and happy. Today was one of those days. We had our first Charity Ride at Fly to raise money for Charity Water. We took the bikes outside for the first time, over to the hotel across the way. There were volunteers, donated coffee and pastries, an amazing DJ to spin during our ride and we raised over $2000!!! It was just......pure awesome. I have been teaching cycling for a little over 6 months and it has become my favorite class ever. There really is something magical about teaching that class. I think because for me, that is one of the few places I can really LET GO. I ride that bike and feel so connected to my body and the music. I can clear my mind, forgive myself for anything, feel strong and powerful, feel emotions that I need to feel. Today, I taught a class way out of my comfort zone. I had a mic for the first time, we were outside on the waterfront, it was a big event. I was so nervous but oh so excited. I am just proud of myself for today... I put that mic on and just felt good. The music was bumpin, the class was pumped up, the vibe was one of a kind. There was a breeze that kept coming through the tent and every time it did, I thought of my mom. There is a poem she wrote before she died and it says, "the breeze on your cheek is me." That wind would come through our tent and I knew without a doubt that she was there. She was probably sayin, "you go girl!"
Natick Public Schools
From where we sit (in a plush purple love sac) being educated means being able to understand the question presented and thoroughly knowing enough relevant information to make a reasoned argument. It’s in making a reasoned argument, not facts, this is our key message today. What ever happened to learning to think and express ones thoughts in a persuasive way?
2. Wabash Cannonball
So to sum everything up we need to see how this market plays out for the remainder of April and into early-May before definitively declaring that April was a high and that a steep correction lies ahead. Sentiment and technicals just don’t seem to support 2012 being a repeat of 2010 and 2011. As I have said in the past week I am cautious, but I’m not bearish. I’m looking for support on the Nasdaq Composite between 2862 and 2900. If that is broken it is okay but not preferred. If the October 2011 high of 2753 is breached that would be cause for concern.
Corey: Stop. Stop. Sentences should not include old people and Good Vibrations.
The Joie de Vivre has given me the Sun reversed.
When I started this blog almost a year ago, I didn't plan on posting every day. It was just meant to be a place to share information that I found in my search for information for my Defeating Cancer Through Education Facebook page, but that wasn't really cancer-related. I didn't however plan to only have twelve posts in a year. Posting 2-4 times a month would be closer to my goal. I got wrapped up in other things and neglected this blog a bit. I have two posts right now that I've been working on and need to sit down and write. I'm grateful for those who have taken the time to read this blog and will have more great information to share (more frequently) in the future.
At T-Mobile we want to give you our customers the best service possible.
These bright purple and green star-like shapes appear to be moving, which can be a little nauseating if you stare at it for too long. Photo courtesy of Angie Armstrong
its all there. What do you think is the clearest way of recording this on a blog?
As minutes stretched into what seemed an eternity of alcohol-induced anguish Jack’s mind completed the reboot process allowing thoughts that were more complex. After realizing he was not actually dead he became aware of the sun peeking through the slates of the shutters covering his windows and the spin of the ceiling fan in the center of his bedroom.
Still holding the back of my head, he grabs me by the hair and yanks me head first onto the bed. He calls me a stupid fucking whore, a dirty pig whore. He grabs for my underwear but ends up ripping the hem of my dress. That makes him even more furious. His hand grabs my foot, pulls me towards him, he rips off my underwear, moves in between my legs and tries to get inside me, but can’t. I didn’t make him wet enough with my saliva. I ruined it. The spit stings, but he is inside. I can leave this room now. He will get what he wants and I can focus on the back of my eyelids.
In response to my last question on CSIR’s revenue sharing policies with its employees, we were given a copy of some guidelines on the point. The guidelines however seem to govern only consultancy or third-part funded research. This would basically cover the Patent Office-CSIR agreements for recruiting patent examiners and conducting prior art research. A part of this money from the Patent Office deals goes directly to CSIR employees. The guidelines do not seem to cover the transfer of royalties from public funded research. The Indian version of the Bayh-Dole Bill is likely to cover this aspect. However given the lack of transparency at CSIR, I would think that the Government may want to add additional safeguards to the draft version of the Bill.
1 large eggplant, unpeeled, cut into 1" cubes
Swiss Chard is a hard Veggie to sell. A lot of people run over to our booth thinking it's Rhubarb. They always ask me what can they do with it. Swiss Chard is a super food in my opinion, It's so full of nutrients!
Both of course wrote to their MP.
*HALLOWEEN – Radio Spot
My Belle de Jour 2012 planner has arrived in the mail! Pretty quick transaction too. I ordered it on Wednesday, paid for it on Thursday, it was shipped out on Friday, and it was already in my hands last Saturday!
If you are like me, you want to pack EVERYTHING, just in case. But then you worry about making your husband carry all those bags up to the millionth floor of your favorite hotel... just for one night.
Please please back up your photos regularly. If you have friends flying to visit you, buy a big portable hard drive, copy everything to it, and have them take it for safekeeping. Having multiple backups in physically separate locations is always prudent.
If, when negotiating for entry into the Common Market, they will make it clear to the other countries concerned that such entry on the part of Great Britain will be possible only if we retain the right to withdraw from such an association at a later date, on due notice given, and under previously agreed conditions, should it be subsequently found that continued membership would be dangerous, or prejudicial, to our national prosperity or way of life.
There are only so many hours in a day and taking on more projects, though in themselves may not be all that bad, may only drain you instead of enhance your life.
Annette had been a student at University College, Swansea (formerly Sketty Anglers Club) long enough to have shed her Saxon, secular resistance to the direct and deeply spiritual sensibility of the Cambrian aesthete. And Swansea is where you are most likely to encounter this Epicurean approach at its most expressive:
“The parking lot. She’s a little concerned about her security.”
This one was our very first day.These three are from the great breakfast buffet at the Holiday Inn Hefei.This one is from Chen Jie's first airplane ride. Notice the smile. Nothing has fazed her so far....Happy girl playing with Daddy and a Chinese parasol.I hope y'all are enjoying our pictures and our story. It will mean alot to us if you can keep us in your prayers and positive intentions. So far, things are going very, very well.
I would venture that "Gorgeous George" as he his known is just a tad more controversial than Nick Griffin!
The cornerstone of allopathic treatment for ovarian cancer is surgery. The goal is to remove as much of the cancer as possible. Chemotherapy, which involves the use of anticancer drugs to kill the cancer cells, is usually administered after the surgery to destroy any remaining cancer.
For by grace you have been saved through faith, and that not of yourselves;
The more I use the Pilot Drawing Pen, the more I keep trying to find something that I don't like about it. Truth is, there really isn't much not to like. My only real gripe is that the line is just slightly less clean and consistent compared to the Sakura Pigma Micron and the Copic Multiliner. In a drawing pen, I want that sharpness, and therefore the Pilot falls in line just behind the other two. It's really a decent pen though.
My friend Christina was nice enough to make up some awesome business cards featuring my nail art pictures. Didn't she do a fantastic job?! And she's accepted payment in the form of polishes. Lol.
I'm ready blog posts if was THIS weekend! Luckily, I have a few pictures to share! I've been working on this project for the past 10 days, the flimsy is nearly completed. Pictures are below....
The adventure is in the searching;
A mockery of another duplicate.
To address this need, GIIP has put together unique international-standard courses that are conducted by Indian and international IP practitioners, to provide comprehensive knowledge about different type of Intellectual Property (IP), related protection systems & their significance, infringement issues and strategies for commercialization and management. GIIP’s aim is to train science, engineering, law, graduates, post-graduates, PhDs, working professionals and the corporate teams to cater to the growing need of the global, knowledge-based, innovation-driven economy. GIIP, a pioneer in IP education, has been involved in Capacity Building for IP & patent professionals and has provided excellent placements to all its students. Some of the organizations with whom GIIP has an enduring recruiting and alumni relationship are: Amarchand & Mangaldas, Anand & Anand, K&S Partners, Remfry & Sagar, Panacea Biotech, Ranbaxy Laboratories, Honeywell, GE, Infosys, HCL,TCS, Siemens, Philiphs, Evalueserve, Altacit Global, Lexadigm, CPA Global, Ripple IP, Inventurus, Ius-Juris, IPpro Inc
It’s wonderful to know that I fit in the one place where it truly matters the most – the Kingdom of God.
If you think you understand, it isn't God.--St Augustine
And so Zabby, Beth, and Eliza, three Elizabeths from very different walks of life, find themselves at the center of the most scandal-filled court that England has ever seen.
Christel - 60
the call came in during my normal friday morning parker & otis coffee date.
Or to have someone call you over to say they’d never even heard of a Kolsch before tonight – and where can I get some more?! Even to see a hardened old VB stalwart (who only ever buys stubbies and not cans and never anything BUT VB) have even a few sips of Hightail, half a glass of Hefeweizen a mere sniff of an APA made the night worthwhile. To hear that he had three pots of Kolsch had me dancing on the table!
But it’s not just business. Just like corporations, public sector groups have early retired, laid off, and reassigned positions to junior teams, reducing their overhead and payroll loads. I heard another shining example of that today.
Mabry currently is home to the Texas Military Forces Academy, the Officer Candidate School, a Non-Commissioned Officers Academy, the Texas National Guard Armory Board, the offices of the Adjutant General, the headquarters of the Texas Air National Guard and Texas State Guard, and a variety of other state and national military-related operations.
I really shouldn't have stressed. We already had things boxed up and ready from our last sale. All I did this time was clean out a closet of old shoes, boots and winter clothes. Basically, John loaded the vehicle this morning, I gathered the money for making change and a few copied images of larger furniture we weren't able to bring but hoped to sell, and we headed off for the grand event at quarter to seven this morning. By 12:30 we were done and home with $135 in profits (and a piece of furniture pending for another $15).
Take the last part of Surah 5 verse 3.
AND IT RATTLED TOO, WORSE THAN THE LAST ONE.
“As always, safety is of paramount concern, and correcting these conditions will require that we postpone laying asphalt replacement until next spring,” the e-mail continued.
4) Tourism must be restored, and the first place to start is by imposing new rules on the French Quarter. It needs to be a safe place to bring your family. Mardi Gras will never be the same, but again...too bad. If you're that hard up for debauchery, go to Vegas and spend your money on gambling or a prostitute. At least you aren't likely to get rolled.
Whether it is correct to call Matt a “comedian” is a moot point. I think he is really an actor with deep comic genes built-into his body.
Feel free to grab the button and let me know if you'll be participating! I'd love to do a highlights post at the end of the week!
There were some wonderful statements Herd makes along the way that are worth chewing on for a while. Here are a few:
The main plot is set at no particular time, but resembles the middle- ages, with kings, queens, peasants, and other miscellaneous characters. It is fictional, having magic, folklore, and mystical creatures that you may only dream of. The main character is named Shadow, a fifteen-year-old fairy whom is compelled to tell the truth. She is most unusual, with her blue eyes and black hair, unlike all the other fairies who have brown eyes and either brown or blonde hair. Her best friends, Cider and Wheat, always try to make her have fun, and misuse her powers for simple pleasure, ending in a loss of their friendship.
When deep inside you a storm is raging and your soul is but a boat upon the lonely seas I want to calm the waves and bring you home
Seventeen-year-old Lochan and sixteen-year-old Maya have always felt more like friends than siblings. Together they have stepped in for their alcoholic, wayward mother to take care of their three younger siblings. As defacto parents to the little ones, Lochan and Maya have had to grow up fast. And the stress of their lives—and the way they understand each other so completely—has also also brought them closer than two siblings would ordinarily be. So close, in fact, that they have fallen in love. Their clandestine romance quickly blooms into deep, desperate love. They know their relationship is wrong and cannot possibly continue. And yet, they cannot stop what feels so incredibly right. As the novel careens toward an explosive and shocking finale, only one thing is certain: a love this devastating has no happy ending.
The station will include bicycle racks; a metal roof with solar collectors; energy efficient lighting; geo-thermal heating and cooling; and storm water management features, such as rain gardens and bioswales.
If you are not familiar with “Doing the Dada” or “Kicking Out The Epic Mother Fucker” or going “Bananas” or drinking mass amounts of Champaign, then you are obviously not familiar with Dada Life. One of the most high energy acts you can possibly witness and this proved true again at Coachella. They debuted a new track that I believe is called “Do The Dada” which was absolutely insane. Dada earned the # 3 spot for day 3 and it was epic to see them rock out in a festival setting.
Their business model works thusly: businesses pay Kidzania to set up stores and other businesses in the park. We, the public, pay Kidzania to go in and role play in these stores. Genius, eh?
Tom Hanks/Meg Ryan (Joe Vs. the Volcano)
-Rory MacDonald is now the #13 welterweight, which sounds about right to me. It’s time to put MacDonald against a high-level opponent (at least, somebody better than Che Mills), and if he wins, he’s in line for a title shot.
We've also got another MP3 for you...
8. Danny Boy (2001) - The Irish Tenors
One of my colleagues asked me what I'm thankful for and I mentioned a few things, including my internship and being able to live in Paris. I am also grateful for the roof over my head, clothes on my back, shoes on my feet, food in my stomach, and almost-perfect health. When I tell Europeans I'm from New York, there is always the same reaction - gasp, shock, smile, followed every single time by "I love New York!" (unless they haven't been, to which they respond "Going to New York is my dream". As my uncle once said, "no it's not - it's a ticket"). So needless to say, I am thankful for being a "yankee". I am beyond thankful for my family and friends, although this really doesn't need to be said because it's a given. Even the friends who have brought nothing but negative energy into my life, I thank you because you made me who I am today. I am grateful to the people who have doubted me- whether it was my graduating high school earlier, studying abroad, and especially moving to Paris. You are the motivation and drive I feed off of to be successful and go for my dream, no matter how elaborate. I am thankful to be a child of Italian immigrants and have the luxury of sharing my time between two continents, spending quality time with relatives who decided to stay behind in their home country and watch their families disappear across the horizon. I am grateful for stories - oral tradition - from older members of my family- stories of war, poverty, death, traditions, hobbies, friendships. Stories that will eventually be lost to the past, never to be spoken of again.
following which Mrs. Madueke later called to thank him
Or am I just a magnet for those that can’t see the nose despite their face? Am I wearing some large neon sign that flashes bright lights and reads “HEY, ASSHOLES AND DOUCHE BAGS WELCOME”? Because I’m here to tell you, you are NOT welcome! Not even slightly! And I will quickly tell you to take a long walk off a short and very high cliff!
I'm blessed with family members and friends who have been marvelous examples to me and influencing me to watch, prepare and enjoy conference. My parents attend almost every conference session at the Conference Center in Salt Lake. I love the phone calls with my sisters, Marcia and Kim, as well as with my mom, Kristin, Heidi, Trista, Rachelle, Noni, Sara... where we talk about our favorite talks and inspirations we've received. It's enriching.
In the One the Wall section of the site, you'll find lots of inspiring rooms that showcase Montrose's stunning photos. Here is a sampling...
run springs till
Sorry I've been MIA for so long - my classes at school got over yesterday (actually Wednesday because yesterday we caroled in the halls for choir and watched "Dolphin Tale" which by the way, is the sweetest movie ever. I laughed and cried and loved it!! I'll be doing a review on it sometime next week (along with some book reviews) over at my other/new blog, The Media Mix . I have a feeling that I'm going to be doing a lot of things next week (including some long over-due posts; sorry for the lack of reading material on here) so we'll see what I end up getting done. We're going to try and get the Christmas/New Year's letter and picture(s) out next week - we didn't do a letter or picture last year, so I really wanted to do one this year. After all, it's my last year home and I did quite a few things last summer that I want people to know about (bragging? maybe a little...:)
Electromagnetic Pulse Attack
Right up until we headed to Reliquary of Souls. For those of you who didn’t experience the walk to RoS, a brief explanation: it was a gauntlet down a long hallway full of ghosts. You’d run as a tight group, AoE the ones you pulled, run again, and AoE again. And you would never, ever, ever attack the mobs before the tank called for AoE. Good raiders don’t attack before they’re told to.
It always amazes me when artists of any genre show no interest in, or knowledge of, other art forms. For me, every kind of art informs and enriches all the others. Not only do I find it fully possible to dance about architecture, I don't even understand why this might be construed as difficult. I'm not a musician, and I like it that way; music provides at least one source of pure inspiration and enjoyment, informing my work in the most direct way. I do not and cannot paint when I don't have music playing; sometimes I'll wake up with a start and realize that I have been staring at a canvas for 45 minutes without moving, simply because the CD ended.
Sets and Costumes: Perfection.
There are choices, every day, that we make, determining how we handle these things.
Anyway, to make up for this unromantic dinner choice, I made a cute valentine dessert. I bought some strawberry and made chocolate covered strawberry.
The also impact spotlight-dwellers like Tim Tebow.
at home mom, Cori Wagner.
One thing that I’m continually surprised at when I’m writing is how much I put myself into the story.
Southern Tier IPA is an American beer. This cloudy beer had a small head and nearly no carbonation. In the nose there was some assertive grapefruit, and the grapefruit also dominated in the mouth. The finish was bitter with a touch of grass. This was a great India Pale Ale and my favourite of these three.
Ok, so I'm still not putting the pieces together. I am thinking it's still about "communication"... only, on a grander scheme. When, actually, it's about the grand finale of my communication era... before I move on to greater things. Ok, so I learned to talk. Now, let's see if I can "navigate"... navigate my own course. Let's add, to that, "charting my own course"... charting the course that I intend to navigate... instead of having someone else chart my course, and call all the shots.
That’s a tough one! There are so many!
Others see you as sensible, cautious, careful & practical. They see
But before we start with that, some good news just broke on Twitter: former Rainiers infielder/outfielder Matt Tuiasosopo has signed a minor league deal with the New York Mets, and he’ll go to spring training and try to win a spot on their roster.
- delusion leads to anger – expressed (shoot the boss down man!) or repressed (so where did you say those beers were – got a load on my head!)
And faded through the brightening air.
The CSA is going really well..my pickup is on Friday and every Thursday night I’m usually scrambling to use up what I had from the week before. I think I also came up with a good way to quantify how much money I’m spending…well, a couple ways.
My contribution to the British Resistance site has never been an endorsement of all the views expressed here, however, as a believer in free speech I respect other writers’ right to hold those views.
A deep vertical fall. Fear gripped him.
Once I have the children in small groups, I try to show the children the relationship that many of the letter sounds have to the letter names. For example, the sound of the M and its letter name have a definite connection, so these letters will be easier for them to learn. The “Sounds to Letters” song on the Singable Songs for Letters and Sounds CD/DVD is also useful for establishing this connection.
Here is my outfit for today:
I’m sure if we could put ourselves in the shoes of King, now 47, who must continue to live in the shadow of the beating he took from the four cops in 1991. This event fueled an already heated racial tension that existed in Southern California, particularly between the African American community and the Los Angeles Police Department.
The yogic system is designed to switch off our analytic minds and encourage our meditative mind. Equally practice encourages the parasympathetic nervous system to do its job, namely relax the bodymind complex. The asanas if well taught will trigger various nerve centres particularly in the lumbar spine, pelvis and pelvic floor if relaxed enough a woman can orgasm. The female orgasm is a complex matter. Truth be known yoga can make a person feel extremely orgasmic in themselves, this is when the yoga student is moving away from yoga as a form of exercise and yoga as it is truly meant meaning Union with the self, I am not surprised many women actually orgasm when they relax enough to meet themselves.
Tale one: VE - 2, Bicyclists - 0
Bracken*
My contribution to this week's
73. How to Eat Fried Worms: Thomas Rockwell
Hole # 4, Creekside Course, par 4, White tees, 377 yards
Couldn't have said it any better myself :)
He clawed my breaths once regular and deep.
For the Brine:
10.Don't give up.
My hunch is that this is because we aren't evolved to life in large groups. Our brains were evolved to live peacefully (relatively) in fairly small groups. Most anthropologists and psychologists I know use ~200 as rough estimate by looking at historical data and examining tribal groups today. We're not evolved to live in groups of 1,000,000,000,000 or whatever size city you happen to reside. Our brains just don't work that way. It is difficult to try to get with that many people. Rarely will I say this, but thank goodness for a larger infrastructure (government) that keeps us relatively well-behaved and functional.
The 230-meter (754-ft) coal tanker Shen Neng 1 was carrying 65,000 tons of coal to China, with 975 tons of heavy fuel oil on board. Based on all the information available, and in all probability, the vessel could break apart causing an even larger disaster.
Tyler Cowen has framed it like this:
The life of the mind flayer begins and ends in the tank of the Elder Brain. As little tadpoles, they're placed in its tank, where it feeds off their psychic energy. Those who survive get to become fully formed mind flayers. At the end of an mind flayer's life, the brain is removed from the creature's head and placed in the tank, where it's absorbed by their leader.
The Gonski glass is half-full, not half-empty. Most public, Catholic and independent school interests have welcomed the report, as have people on either side of politics.
I hate Chrome's "status bubble" that only pops up sometimes. Looks like Firefox copied 'em.
According to this article, ostracism cuts deeper and lasts a lot longer than any physical pain. It is like a form of bullying that does not leave bruises on us. Also, there are three stages in ostracism and they are the actual act of being excluded, coping and resignation. Man, can I relate to these. During the first stage, people have learned that they have been left out and are hit with the harsh reality. The pain is there and is real. So, instead of moving on, many times we move to the second stage to cope. During this phase, we start acting out in ways that will garner acceptance. It is like going against what you believe or selling your soul to these people in some respect. I see a lot of Queen Bee’s use a lot of bargaining during this phase. This is why these abusers have so many followers. They do not want to be excluded. However, if still being excluded and have been coping and getting nowhere, people will generally turn towards aggressive means or they give up completely. This is known as resignation. If the person has tried hard enough and still cannot get that acceptance, they take it into their own hands or just move on. I believe this is where school shooters come in. They have tried, worked hard, followed, sold their soul and done everything but still nothing changes. So, they take things into their own hands. Folks, a person can only take so much until they snap.
Every family answerability hatch their own satay. Serve satay at your potluck, picnic, bbq assembly, family gathering, etc. Prerogative this lens, I would equivalent to share my satay recipes. Authentic ' s flawless for grilling on torrid summer interval. Share these satay recipes cloak family and friends. Like.
Who knew that "forty thousand dollars" could make you feel so good?
Lemon juice, 2 table spoons
1/2 cup mashed potato
Im sure the lovely people at the RBU wont mind if i copy and paste their paragraph,
Nike launched out from the Orion's bay, her instrument panels were fuzzy, something was screwing with her systems. The Raptor was a specially designed and outfitted craft for intelligence gathering, it's systems were some of the most advanced in military craft but seemed worthless at the moment. She pounded her fists on the panel, cursing the Gods.
1) a loop
I think, honestly, we would do what makes us happy. If my happiness is here, I should stay, if I believe it is somewhere, I should go. But I believe I found happiness here, and I believe I should stay, at least for a time. I mean, not staying because of the place, I'm staying for one person. I think I couldn't survive far from him, I'd be very lost without him.
Thatcher: For us - the accessibility geeks - Brother John is accessibility
Radish
Memo to O: If you’re so interested in securing the nation, why do you continue your incessant efforts to divide its people? Why do continue your relentless drive to mortgage the future of “the nation’s” grandchildren – all for the self-serving reason of pandering for votes?
I was feeling good. I had just arrived home after pushing through a challenging Zumba class. I went to my mailbox, rummaged through the mail, and there it was.
Ara
him.'" 1 Kings 18:21
Diving into self-publishing in April changed all of that, and in a few days I will finally publish this novel. I had planned to publish in the summer, but a dalliance with the wrong editor set me back some. I then sent the MS to my current (superb) editor, almost as a cry for help. She quickly stopped me running in the wrong direction, and gave clear, detailed advice about what was strong, and what needed work.
Where you an avid reader as a child?
BF: Yes, it’s very well documented.
Prayer for Today:
I turn to see Michael Jackson standing behind me.
Breivik is not an implacable foe of multiculturalism; he is a product of it. He is multiculturalism’s monster, where his true aim is to win recognition of his identity alongside all those other identities that are fawned over in modern Europe. In essence, his barbarous act last year was not about dismantling multiculturalism but about expanding it, to make sure it afforded respect to his own petty cultural feelings as well as everyone else’s.
Then there’s the glider-rocker stashed downstairs that I really wanted to refinish or at least re-cover in a different fabric (currently white rocker with denim-blue cushions)…hunh…
Your hot water heater represents about 20-30% of the carbon emissions of your home, the biggest user of energy in your house. Consider setting your hot water thermostat to 120°F. Insulate your hot water tank with an insulation jacket if available for your system. Arrange for your boiler to be serviced so it runs more efficiently. When you next replace your boiler, consider a condensing boiler - they use less fuel than conventional boilers to produce the same amount of heat and can save 32% on fuel bills.
Last night was Katie's big opening night, and...well...wow. Not sure what else I can say. Just wow. There are no other words. A perfect performance by the entire cast.
Besides foretelling an increase in pollution, these figures make it abundantly clear that providing shore power for visiting ships should be well within reach financially. Based on an article presented on the C40 Cities website, for cruise ships berthed in Seattle, which provides shore power, running cost per call was approximately $5,000. Granted, electric rates are lower in the Northwest. But, using these numbers, the projected 264 calls in NY would cost a total of $1.32M. That works out to about $2.05 per projected passenger. Even if the cost was 5x higher, it would total about $10 per passenger.
An Asian man and woman dressed in civvies beckoned me to one of the gurneys, next to which was a table covered in sharp, shiny blades and a syringe like a drainpipe.
Somebody – the writer of this article – said jokingly, “And the heroic Danish Police is marching in the front line of the popular demonstration in solidarity with the diverse people of Denmark“.
I am a few days behind, so I will share my tags from day 1 and 2 today.
What if we used it to receive messages from the text?
Thank God. Finally, a romance that is natural and lightly enchanting, almost sweet with its subtlety. Gideon was a complete prat at times, but he's a good sport when Gwyn doesn't take it lying down. Their easy banter was a thrill.
WHOOP DEE WHOOP!! My New Lili of the valley stamps came in the post yesterday, which means I can play along in their weekly challenge this week. Which is Bring on the music, you can find out more here
Things seem to get weirder and weirder as strange confessions are made to Annie by some of her former friends. All of them seem to have a reason to want Iris Tilford dead. Some of them are downright hostile when Iris announces that she wants to do something to honor Iris’s memory but which one of them actually killed her? This is the question that Annie is determined to answer, even if it puts her own life in jeopardy.
Criminal Kabbalah, edited by Laurie R. King
Now I really have to go to class.
Melted Butter - 2 tablespoon
Fear is a mean little pr*ck. And takes great joy in stopping you. In turning your dreams into a lost cause.
You could have been told in elementary school by some kid that “you can’t be part of our group.” And you may have accepted this and recorded the thought of “I can’t be part of the group.” And you may be all grown up now and wondering why you shy away from working in groups! Well, this thought may still be playing around inside of you and causing you to feel uncomfortable working in groups! Double yikes!
LS: That’s an amazing question. I really couldn't tell the difference for a long time, but when I look back at old scripts, I can see how things got ignored. I still think it's important to write what's in your head, because even if it doesn't get produced, it could end up being your best sample of your voice. Even though I liked exploring characters, it took a long time for me to figure out structure. I still grapple with it. A book called "The Writer's Journey" and a very patient Dana Fox taught me some phrases and tricks. I still resist convention between the second and third act, which accounts for the change in pace in "Nick and Norah's" as well as "Seeking A Friend.” I think it's most important to concentrate on theme and tone. Those will make your story distinct and reveal the "trailer moments" of your script. After that, I think pacing is key. Hearing a script out loud is a good indicator of its possibilities.
(And create 11 new questions for the people you tag to answer, if you can).
I am acutely aware of how tied to technology we are, how much it rules our lives, how dependent on it we are, how we are slaves to the machines. I have read those articles which discuss the way the internet is changing our brains, how some children are addicted to their phones/computers
notions of countryside early mornings just before world awakens. It feels like the
Q. Describe your job. What does the executive director of the Reese Felts Digital Project do?
How did it come to this? How can I so easily dismiss people as less worthy or less talented or less intelligent or less anything than me? What, after all, makes me so special?
We will now be taking the correct advice and actions regarding Mr Murray's incorrect statement and allegations as to the nature of the party. This was unquestionably decided in court last year that the British National Party has a constitution that is not racist. The ECHR has stated"Mr Griffin has finally amended the constitution to bring it in line with what the Commission had originally requested"
Fenugreek seed powder - 1 pinch
exhibiting a high degree of some quality or action.
Finally, getting through a tough times isn't always about buying the cheapest thing in the beer isle. A 27 oz. bottle of Sheif's Stout, is the darkest, creamiest thing one can buy for $2.78. It will sustain you. Or, try buying a couple bottles of Killian's Irish Red by the bottle. The six-pack at Fredy's is perpetually on sale for $4.99, or $0.84 for a 12 oz. bottle. Sure, ">Coors is tricking you into thinking it's a microbrew, but... fuck it, at least you're not stealing.
As well as the new and revamped magazines, Egmont is also launching a new collectable series of Thomas story books, based on the latest season of the long-running TV series, aimed at 1–3 year olds.
Corbett National Park India is a fabulous wildlife reserve in India. In fact it is one of the biggest tiger reserves in Asia. The giganticness of the park is backed by a wide gamut of flora of fauna. Tourists across the world throng this national park to experience the best proximity to mother nature. And the best thing about Jim Corbett National Park is that everyone can visit here without compromising with budget. There are many tour operators on web and in almost every major city of the country that provide tour packages for Jim Corbett National Park. It’s pertinent to mention here that reviewing all the available tour packages prior to tour is very important. This will help you shape your vacation in the best possible way. By reviewing tour packages you can customize your vacation and avail loads of advantages.
Damn, Mandy thought. Ruby Mountain was just upstream from Brown’s Canyon, a rushing series of Class III and IV rapids that was the most popular whitewater rafting run on the upper Arkansas River. If the man’s fishing waders filled up and he was washed into the canyon, his chances were slim to none. Worried it might be someone she knew, Mandy asked, “What’s the man’s name?”
White Pads. Most nibs wrote smoothly, but the paper tend to absorb ink, resulting in severe bleedthrough and nibs tending to write broader lines than on other papers, but without the ink actually feathering much. As I wrote in my review (which, technically was of some discontinued pads that may differ from the current Freeleaf variety), for the limited uses I had for the pads, I could live with the bleedthrough, so that performance deficit was outweighed by the smooth writing experience.
I'd give anything for you to just take me.
And the end was a sweet blossoming of spring in the subatomic bouquet of space
The exposed solum in Princes Street is a welcome sign that Edinburgh's tram project has resumed with a vengeance.
-He's also recently developed an opinion and he will throw his head back if he doesn't like what's going on
Foul - You will receive a foul if you step over the foul line.
Once that was done, all I had to do was paint it (I used my Martha Stewart black paint), and let it dry, and it was all done! I LOVE IT!!!! I wore it with a lace undershirt because I HATE short shirts, so it gave it the look of being long. I didn’t bother writing -Bob Dylan, because if you don’t know Bob Dylan sang it, then you wouldn’t appreciate it anyway!
It's moments like these that make me realize how perfect Alex is. How we are meant to be. I love his family and I know they love me. It's a good feeling.
No diagnoses
She could be here as early as Thursday, May 3 or Friday, May 4!
Hillary, 24, who married hockey player husband Mike Comrie in August 2010, added: “We are overjoyed and feel like the luckiest parents in the world…..He is surrounded by so much love!! Mom and baby are both doing extremely well.”
The following week my apartment became a hotel for a few days while my friend Megan was in town. She cooked quesedillas (with real American salsa!) for me and kept the dirty dishes out of my kitchen sink. Then we were off to Hannover, for a weekend of reliving our grad school days, including tuna melts and towers of beer, people watching at 2 for 1 beer night, karaoke and rickety carnival roller coasters.
With a little judicious editing, Zodiac could have been a much more compelling film. As is, it’s interesting to see a director of such technical proficiency branch out a bit, and Fincher captures good performances from his male-heavy cast, particularly Mark Ruffalo. (Though he doesn’t work with women often, I think two the most sucessful performances in Fincher films have come from Jodie Foster and Sigourney Weaver.) But if the film is supposed to be suspenseful or frightening, it fails on both counts, and it lacks both the tightness of a true procedural drama or the substance of a character ensemble. In short, Zodiac isn’t quite sure what kind of film it’s supposed to be.
SM: Well seeing as I've sold a total of three copies of my book, I don't know that I can give advice to anyone. But something I've learned from other people who have been successful is that you should write the book you're dying to read.
Silvio Cascione – Reuters, 04/24/2012
Modesty aside, I think we've both created our best ones to date
I also need to better organize my scarves. We also have 2 dressers that could be gone through again – we did some of the 13 drawers…
Maybe I’m just damaged. Maybe I’m not supposed to see this way. Maybe the reason I don’t fit in is because there is something wrong with me. I’ll never know whether that part is the truth or not. Frankly, I could care less.
one of us makes a quart jar of homemade soup that is delivered to the
I need a new phone anyway. When I get home on Thursday I’m gonna pester the ‘rents to let me use my upgrade. I need a new phone. iPhone 3 sucks.
There’s no getting around it. I’ve only got one chance this week.
8. SOYLENT GREEN (1973) and SILENT RUNNING (1972) at the Vortex Room. Again, I was full of booze, so I kinda snoozed through a bit of the middle of SILENT RUNNING, but they were still both very cool. And the fact that I put dystopian future sci-fi above dumb blond eye candy sci-fi probably says something about me.
It is all about our mindset.
chooses to open to her self
Since springtime, the girls have been practicing a dance in their Chinese dance class that they take weekly. In early December, the girls performed their dance in a competition in Los Angeles, CA and received gold trophies for their efforts (which is really 2nd place). I think they were the youngest dancers in the competition.
Though I must say, to be very honest with you...
Where there is darkness, light;
ALso I love her cause she has a nose ring- like me!! Yeah 90s.
So the prompt is to "write a procrastination" or a "proactive" poem.
Then we found out it was Mike, Bungholio and Nancyboy from previous versions of the instance group. He was going for humor, so the laugh worked, though in hindsight he said that he really should have added a “Z” to the end of his name.
The enemies of freedom are not so stupid to try and take our freedom(s) in a big, bold action. It is more effective to cook the American voter like the slowly boiled frog. Unexamined sayings like “from the get-go” are a symptom of the slow creep of authoritarianism, socialism and Marxism into our daily American lives.
Zanu-PF and the ANC form part of the frontline states, which pride themselves as being ruled by former liberation movements.
Chippy's wife, Zerena, apparently worked as a personnel clerk.
I understand that our driving goal and vision is size and numbers. I get that. I also realize that a committed Christian life is not for everyone and that if we make authentic discipleship our goal, we will lose a lot of people and attract fewer. I can understand the low expectations and I even understand why people are downgrading discipleship to be open to all. In 1998, I conducted a survey that showed that 71% of United Methodist’s defined discipleship as “believing that Jesus is God’s Son.” All that has happened is that this has now been adopted as the UM standard. It really helps us live with our mission of “making disciples of Jesus Christ for the transformation of the world.” As long as discipleship is defined in simplistic, non-demanding terms the church doesn’t have to get serious about changing. What we are already doing is good enough.
Not even Buckingham Palace
__Archaeological excavations in burial places of medieval nomads here and there find various jeweller wares, executed by the craftsman’s of Middle Asia, Western Europe and Byzantium, taken by them as military trophies.
“Ms Risser, may I say how positively radiant you are this evening? Your skin glows like the waters of the River Congo at sunset.”
May I quite clearly state here and now as a long term UKIP supporter seeking to see filth like Derek Clark tossed out on his ear for yet again bringing UKIP into disrepute, that UKIP Is OUR only Lifeboat and it is festering self seeking liars like Derek Clark who have made it unfit for any decent patriot to vote for, with his destruction of the regional party, collapse of the membership he has caused, outright dishonesty and corruption which is a matter of public record and now his abuse of privilege and office to use that position to lie about me and others at a public meeting.
Yippee!
looks all right
By Susie Rain, IMB.
But ten more pages passed and it still wasn’t crumbling. Ten MORE pages passed, and it actually *started getting better.* And then the midpoint came and I realized, Holy Shit, this is the real deal.
Despite knowing next to nothing about selling cars, Ang knew he had found his calling.
I understand that I am part of the problem. Instant gratification is intoxicating and I love it. I love to get an email that tells me the exact moment when someone likes or comments on one of my posts. I can’t get enough of it. I enjoy being loved and appreciated just like the next wandering fool looking for an audience.
What are the advantages and disadvantages of being Freshly Pressed? And how would I know if I were?
In the mean time, no, it's not ok to call 911 when you got into a wreck 5 days ago, with a shopping cart. Take a minute and think before you call 911 for something that is NOT an emergency.
The fabrics, handmade felt flowers and buttons are what caught my eye, and I was in the mood for something a little different than my typical cards, so I set to work with a small jar, some buttery looking fabric, quilt batting, and my own handmade flower...
Another attempt at a World’s largest but a different category than a claw game, an iPhone controlled game. Hyundai set-up a huge iPhone controlled game at buzzing Times Square, New York on a huge billboard. What I liked about this particular activity was that it involved the users to register and download an app to play the game. Hyundai provided Wi-fi at Times Square to connect users to play the game. This is a great opportunity to capture data of the people playing the game and use it for follow-ups later on.
great friends (who love me in spite of previous items mentioned).
The candles cast a soft shadow against the dark of the bathroom and the bath bubbles had spilled over the edge of the tub. I always add too much bubble bath. Even when I was little I was never happy if there weren’t enough bubbles. He rubbed his hands along my arm leaving a trail of goose bumps as he went. There are times in life when you do things you know you shouldn’t do, things you know will, in the end, hurt you. But you do them anyway.
Disputed Texts
around trees
Fabric & Finish: Braid, Hair Cloth, Plush, Tapestry, Velour, Velvet, and Needlepoint fabrics; Gilding (gold leaf) and Oil Varnish
Most international flights would have landed here at the International Auckland Airport. When you exit the plane and enter the airport, remember to grab the free magazine – Arrival - a guide to New Zealand. It is only available in Auckland International Airport, not at Christchurch Airport or elsewhere. If you are switching to a domestic flight, please remember to collect your luggage first. The transfer of bags to your next flight is not automatic. You also need to clear customs here even though you are changing to a domestic flight.
My friend seemed quite happy with the selection – Chateau La Fleur Poitou Lussac Saint Emilion. It was one of the most inexpensive wines on the menu, but it didn’t detract from the rare filet and T-bone that we were eating.
Since I'm teaching a class on lucet weaving at Costume College this year, I felt I had to put rubber to the road, so the speak. So, the straps and front of the stays are laced with standard lucet cord, made from cotton crochet cord, and the back is laced with double lucet cord. I think the cord is certainly sturdy enough for this application...I just need to get all the stretch out.
Mythology and spiritual belief predict Mankind has enough presence of mind to make a quantum leap in consciousness, to save itself. History says it’s never too late to start anew. Native American and Maya traditions say now is a good time.
~You’re not gonna check the trunk are you?
beg = beginning
Modeled after the world-renowned Africa Shrine created in the ‘70s by their legendary father, Fela Anikulapo Kuti, the originator of the Afrobeat genre, today's version, like the elder maverick, serves as both a place of entertainment and a think tank for a social and political movement.
The infiltration of our government was commented upon - she wants more - more Muslims in parliament - well she would, this will enable the Muslims to have a greater effect upon our country on their terms.
That should have been on American Pickers!
Garlic paste:1/4 tsp
or prevent them from being multipathed by vxdmp (This operation can be
We rode without stopping from the bridge over the Elbow River near Fort Calgary to Harvie Passage, another big City project that has replaced an extremely dangerous weir built in 1904 to divert water for agriculture. The river structures that will allow for much safer rafting, tubing, canoeing and kayaking look pretty much finished. Signage and landscaping still need to be completed. We found a unique Brass Cap here and then continued into Pearce Estate Park to put new log sheets into two geocaches we placed in 2008 for publication concurrent with our second WWFM event. The traditional cache has been found almost 200 times while there are fewer than 100 finds for the multi-cache that requires geocachers to walk / bike the trails in Pearce Estate Park to learn all about wetlands in order to work out the coordinates for the container.
Subtext:
To be located at the Sons of Italy in Woburn. Each team may consist of four to ten people, at a cost of $150 per team. We will again offer the “Mulligan” and the “Buy-Back-In” offers. Dress up, bring your own eats and “keep your head up, oh, And you can let your hair down.”
Bos Stefan came over to build a shelf. You see his assistant in the photo and bos Niko. They are sawing and fitting and nailing but everyone is saying to me "So you're building a shelf?" meanwhile I'm lounging on a chair (albeit with the feverish Gabriela draped over me). This comment used to drive me cRRRazy especially when cooks would say to me: "You're making Haitian chicken and pikliz?" and then I'd give them money and they would take a bath, put on fancy clothes, go to the market, bargain for everything, carry it home including the live chicken, wash and chop and grate everything into identical pieces without a cutting board, kill, pluck, and boil the chicken, stand for hours tending several bubbling pots, wash the dishes and set them out, arrange the food in serving bowls...wash the dishes, go home, make more food, wash more dishes. This is the Haitian chicken that I !!!! was making. On the other hand, we all know that the chicken like the rice that will steam beside it, is not just mine, never was and never will be. Here in Haiti, where work is done outside, often on the street if not viewable from it, it's more obvious to everyone where things come from and where they go. The chickens are part of the daily symphony called dawn and later walk threw the neighborhoods in generous baskets on the top of market ladies heads. I buy rice directly from farmers that i know and whose fields i've visited. Anyone who has been to Haiti knows that the Haitian cook can not help cooking for a crowd, a hungry crowd!, and that there will be parts of the savory free-range chicken that no one in my little family will want to eat, like some organs, and if we're nice we'll give these out in foresight with the extra rice. The chicken bones will get sucked and any last meaty morsels will feed someone's dog.
And here is my response:
This morning, we arrived bright and early at the hospital for Maddy's pre-op assessments. She had to meet with the cleft surgeon, the ENT surgeon and audiologist, the anesthetist, and she had to have a blood test to confirm she was infection-free.
Where do they find these nutjobs?
If you want to enhance your existing finishes without making the color more intense,
This bathroom was a real piece of work, let me tell you.
3And they sing the song of Moses the servant of God, and the song of the Lamb, saying, Great and marvellous are thy works, Lord God Almighty; just and true are thy ways, thou King of saints.
I also ran the Chuy's 5K on Cinco de Mayo. It was my first race back after having a baby and it felt so good to run again! My goal was to run it under 25 minutes and my time was 24:41. I'll take it!
Some of the images are with black doors and others are with white. I think either way works and lean toward keeping everything white except the windows. I still have the grids for the windows and could easily paint those and the windows black.
News to me as well. Who knew he even liked guns?
And, since all Human beings are sinful by nature, it becomes necessary to verify all that we say & claim. After all, it is the Prophet (Peace be upon him) himself, who has said, “If people were allowed to make baseless-claims, they would take the lives & wealth of others indiscriminately. However, the clarity is upon the claimant, otherwise they must take an oath.”.(An-Nawawi) This statement makes it very clear, that we are not allowed to just say things without them being truthful. We are obligated to have all that we claim to be honest, as well as verifiable. Muhammad (Peace be upon him) has also said, “The life, property & integrity of a Muslim is sacred.”.(An-Nawawi) This obviously means that no one has the right to take your life, property, or ruin your reputation, unless there is an Islamically justifiable reason to do so, and in almost all cases, you have to dig pretty damn deep, in order to find any Islamic justification to take someone’s life, property, or destroy their reputation; and, even the lives, properties & integrity of Non-Muslims are protected under Islamic-Law.
Africans, Wingfield Sugar Plantation, Old Road, St Kitts by Nia Ashanti
I was a bit disappointed with the ending, too. It wasn’t what I’d expected.
Sony Ericsson, who are now simply Sony once again have worked very hard to rebuild their bad reputation over software updates issues they had with their 2009/2010 phones. With the Sony Arc and the new models they have done a job that has been even better than Samsung, which has reflected well in the higher sales of they very cool looking mobile devices.
212.647.9956
One time I went to a free tv taping for some Japanese tv show at the now demolished London Astoria. The gig was so loud that afterwards I have a memory of my friend and I shouting at each other in Virgin Megastore on Oxford street (which I think is also gone now), with most other people in there looking at us. We didn’t realise we were shouting. The ringing in our ears was blocking it out. Still there was a good version of “Night vision” and an awe inspiring version of “the man don’t give a f*ck”, which sent the Astoria’s legendary bouncy floor, a bouncing. Short of them coming out as Nazi’s or racists, it was hard not to love them after that.
Designer Paper - My Mind's Eye - Bohemian Christmas - Merry Paisley Paper, Merry Reindeer Paper
“I’ll Be Around”
Thank you again, Laura, you're right, us newbies have to stick together. She has a great site full of fun vintagey crafts, amazing furniture makeovers, and more. Just the name of her blog Our Prairie Home makes me want to visit. :)
If you’re in business school now and thinking about launching your company, I want you to ask yourself: Will you be ready to get down and dirty in the code if no one else can? Will you enjoy working long hours tweaking your SEO strategy if you can’t hire someone to do it for you? Will you be psyched to attend technical webinars about new services for the cloud?
It’s a good prospective for the future.
This seminar series is available for credit as Communicating Climate Science Seminar: Messaging Your Science (Winter and Spring quarter, 1 credit) (PCC 593) ATM S/OCEAN/ESS 593.
I have always been a night owl. I sleepwalk through most mornings, functioning just enough to get my kids ready for school, and not crash my car into a tree getting them there. Many morning people have tried to convert me, all with no success. Here’s how the conversation usually goes between me and a typical early bird:
Occasionally, the names are thrust upon me. I met a young man named Brantley Fowler at a local Enterprise car rental outlet. I told him I was going to “steal” his name and make him famous. Brantley Fowler is the main character in A Touch of Velvet. His “lady” is a young woman named Velvet Aldridge. Years ago, I had a student named “Velvet.” It was the perfect name for that young lady and for my character.
After that, I got in line to get into the venue to watch Robot and Frank starring Frank Langella and Susan Sarandon (unfortunately, either she said no, the festival couldn't afford her, or they didn't try to get her because she wasn't there...though there was one woman in the audience who resembled her.) It was a cute flick, though it felt a little long. And needed more Susan Sarandon (but I'm biased as I love her like whoa.)
A professional tango dancer said to me that he used to be in shows, once upon a time, but compared to improvisation (and social dancing, even to not very good live music) he just found it painfully boring. I paraphrase, but that was the gist. "Tango is about making mistakes," he said. Apparently he just didn't get the rush from an audience.
“Honesty is calmness, and lies are doubt, and righteousness is the best of conduct, and sins are that which is woven within your heart, and you would be ashamed lest it would be discovered by the people. Seek your heart’s counsel.” (Hadith)
Anyway, I know I've said it before but this time I'm finally going back to short fiction--and not just any old short fiction--I'm going to explore flash fiction and have fun writing again. I've ven today enrolled on an online flash-fiction course (Impeccable credentials, of course.) Not for publication or to win prizes although it might lead to something. If it doesn't, so what? I'm still here. I'm still breathing and while I can breathe I will enjoy being alive. And writing is a big part of that for me even if my body does its best to scare me from time to time.
Certain styles of beer go well with certain foods (say, a Kolsch with seafood) while some don't (a malty English ESB and Mexican food — beer pairing FAIL). And it gets boring drinking the same style.
Descent a piet, a la tere se culchet,
David Bowie Absolute beginners UK
For this challenge I would love to see a color combination of pale and just a bit darker blue with tones from cream to brown. Let this picture inspire you. Of course skin colors are allowed on your stamped image if you are using people.
As my colleague at the law school says, its all Perception Karachi feminist, its all perception! And I fire back, my eyes red, its not perception, corporate lawyer! Phillip Morris is not perception. Its lung cancer. Tanneries are not perception. Its toxic waste. There is a system of economic exploitation and its real. Its a matter of degree, he says smiling inwardly, his eyes getting the glazed look that this person is a fringe radical and had she been at a law firm, She is SO fired! I am not a fringe radical. I recognize degrees, and I do not expect unrealistic boycotts, I reply. And some point, we have to draw the line. We have to differentiate and take positions. Other wise everything becomes meaningless.
stain patio
I just wanted to share that with you!
I have been getting lots of comments and emails with questions lately about my training, my nutrition, my fueling, etc. etc. I will be answering these in some upcoming posts. If you have a question, feel free to leave a comment and I will do my best to answer all of them.
I hope now you've found us, you'll stick with us and continue to support us and help our little challenge grow.....
This means that if you are instructed by a supervisor like the fictional Wally Malvone to engage in dirty tricks and black ops (like those that actually took place under Operation Fast And Furious), you are honor bound to blow the whistle, like the brave ATF Special Agents who remained faithful to their oaths and preserved their integrity. There can be no more of protecting killers because they are federal law enforcement agency "informants," like the members of the Whitey Bulger Irish mob in Boston, or the FBI "informant" who was the likely assassin of Border Patrol Agent Brian Terry in Arizona.
This year I decided to try something different. Earlier in the year I took some shots from the Holyrood side of the Radical Road around Salisbury Crags trying to get traffic light trails with a backdrop of the Parliament and Calton Hill. The idea struck me, why not try and combine the two? So that’s what I did. 2 cameras set up, D7000 with the Sigma 70-200mm shooting Calton close in in portrait format, the D90 with the Nikon 18-200mm lens shooting the wide scene on 15s exposures to get the light trails and the fireworks. And guess what? It worked. Exactly the shot I wanted and something I’ve not seen done before.
Hung up to reflect directly into my mirror.
And the winner: NBA Jam
But, there is a mystery that goes on around me, from time to time.
Apprehensions about anti-US sentiments
King of Beasts,
Another gift with purchase I got is a baby bottle of Dior Vernis in 943 Rouge Garçonne (literally means boyish red, though I have no idea what’s boyish about it). Here is a picture of it in comparison with the full-size bottle of Incognito. Cute eh?
This is one of the more traditional samplers I've stitched. This was for my friends Lizzie and Andy. There was such a lot of detail in this design and I completely underestimated how long it was going to take me to stitch... I kept putting off starting it and ended up having only three weeks to stitch it over Christmas a couple of years ago... I virtually had to stitch night and day to finish it in time!!! I really love it though, I think it's one of my favourites.
I'm loving that we are already halfway through the week!
Then, too, the stakes in such places didn’t seem very high when measured against heated Cold War rhetoric that made the prospect of nuclear holocaust a nightmarish possibility. The Eisenhower Administration developed a policy of “massive retaliation” that promised “more bang for the buck.” A Soviet leader promised to bury us. I practiced “duck and cover” drills at school and watched helpful public service announcements on TV that showed me what to do if the Russians dropped an A-bomb on my neighborhood.
Peter Brown sees growth in Late Antique culture, not decay. In classical culture, society, state, and religion are one, Late Antique culture is the beginning of private religions of all types, and the beginning of a definite separation of public and private life. The breakdown of the small city-state with its small city-state religion gives rise of to an independent monolithic world-state. It is a messy time of experimentation and personal exploration which dovetails nicely with Constantine’s conversion of the empire to a supremely personal religion: christianity. The inner life of a citizen is no longer focussed on the state, but is focussed on a personal spirituality: a person’s inner and outer worlds are irrevocably divided now – both are much freer to change without influencing the other. This, according to Brown, is a good thing.
So, she chose another 11 fabrics to go in her quilt.
Remove cover, add bean
Love from The Magnolia DT!
Before you chop up the celery, peel it. This is one of those things I think everyone knows, but given the number of times I get celery strings in my food either at a restaurant or a potluck or whatever, I'm guessing everyone does not know this. So, peel your celery people! It is quick and well worth the extra step!
You are easy to be around and never offend everyone. You're quite mild.
When it’s in barbecue mode, according to the article, Palin’s head appears to be “steaming with anger”:
Nothing fancy, mind you. Just lots and lots, picked up at cheapo prices (Primark, H&M etc).
Hello there! My name is Jenn and I am a writer for Arcadian Home Decor, which is an e-commerce website that specializes in top home decor ideas around the world. In addition to blogging about my own design attempts, recipes, and craft projects, I love perusing great home decor blog like Honey + Fitz because, like the stylish owner of this site, I love where I live. I'm excited to be writing a guest post today about another thing I adore: organized (and stylish) laundry rooms.
Recently I translated this travel article I wrote from Nepal. Now I’m on a journey to the French Alps, so I don’t have time to write. But I’ll leave you with these two photos from Oslo:
with Monsieur Leon’s dawn whistling. He starts on a low note, like a timid violin
76. Red Necks, White Socks and Blue Ribbon Beer -- Hank Thompson
Police received a 911 call about a gunshot and possible suicide at Seau’s Oceanside, Calif., residence around 10 a.m. PT, a dispatcher told the San Diego Union-Tribune. That publication too had confirmation of Seau’s death.
“Some people would identify this as the choice between the urgent and the important. For me, it’s more a matter of permission. The image came to mind of the hall passes we used to get in junior high and high school. As long as you had that all-important little pink slip, you were allowed to be in the hallway or library. So I decided to make myself a “creativity pass”! My hope is that it will serve as a tangible reminder to give myself the permission to go ahead and play.
Stay tuned to allkpop for rookie group NU’EST’s debut on March 15th with their debut single, “Face”!
Running long distances is not exactly a social activity and would not seem to be a rich source of anecdotes but Karnazes weaves enough anecdotes into the narrative to make it an enjoyable read even when it is dealing with something I have absolutely to experience. I didn’t read this book and then think about starting to run. However, I can imagine many couch potatoes being inspired to get their A into G after reading this. As inspirational books go this one hits the mark.
Everyone waited, suspended. After several minutes, a few people began to ask what was going on. Is this a drill? Finally the security leader gave the loud ALL CLEAR. And the same answering shouts as personnel returned to their original positions. A security person came to our line and pushed through someone’s luggage and told the person about to approach the exray belt, “This luggage goes through first.” And then everything returned to normal. No explanations. We couldn’t tell what had just happened, except to suspect someone was removed from that line and taken away. We didn’t see the owner of the luggage return.
Your sister?
Moroccan Spiced Braised Lamb Riblets
When American kids are falling behind the rest of the industrialized world in math and science, it's sad.
The word nonduality could work as a red pill if you value its meaning enough to follow it as deeply as you can. When Neo was being given his choice of pills, his teacher and mentor Morpheus explained to him:
The post from two weeks ago made me think about the Joiners and all the gigs I went to. Probably the most famous gig that I never went to was the Whiteout and Oasis double headliner. Back in 1994, I had become dissatisfied with the music scene with limited interest in grunge and britpop. I looked backward towards Spacemen 3 and Echo and the Bunnymen instead. My friends told me at the time Whiteout were much better on the evening than Oasis. I would have to take their word on this, as I was not there.
Thanks to everyone who stopped by for ICLW! It was so nice to "meet" you, and I appreciate your visits and your comments more than you know!
Beecher Stowe
2. Buyers seek rich content IDX and VOW solutions, Realtor.com, Trulia and Zillow provide access to virtually all the listings in most market areas. Most buyers comb these major sites simply because it’s more efficient than searching for single properties.
Be the best wife I can be to Mr D.
Where the fuck was the taser? Oh yea, tasers aren't for stopping shootings, they are for torturing people who don't comply.
Own we’re dreamersa
Explanation: For the purposes of these regulations content shall be deemed to be obscene if its effect is such as to tend to deprave and corrupt persons who are likely, having regard to all relevant circumstances, to read, see or hear the matter contained or embodied in it.
7. Tomb of Laleth. Most of this room is taken up by a octagonal platform. Three steps led up to the platform. The room is lit in an eerie blue fire by a single large brazier in the middle of the platform. Faint ghostly whispers can be heard throughout the tomb. Slowly Laleth the undead revenant of an ancient bard becomes visible. His translucent fingers hold a long, ornately carved flute. His cold lips produce twisted and malevolent sounds of some strange and dreadful enchantment, when four Songhaunts appear out of nowhere and attack while Laleth utters a terrible and blistering curse from the black dephts of his soul. During combat Laleth employs fear invoking sounds, deadly illusions, as well as soul shredding dirges capable of slaying the PC's where they stand. These effects can be countered by a bard. During combat Laleth also tries to possess a PC or NPC with the highest charisma to escape his prision. He tries to kill everybody else.
I love this man.
Just like last week, at the end of this weekend of training, I was filled with much joy and peace over this process and our coming journey! VERY minimal anxiety, which is a huge testimony!
The wait staff all fussed and pampered them and came over and engaged them in conversation. Yep, they were going to Prom. They were from a local high school and the prom was being held at the Tacoma Art Museum. They seemed to be comfortable with each other, chatting and laughing and enjoying their Sushi. They seemed uncomfortable in their “fancy schmancy” clothes, tugging and adjusting and pulling and fussing……
My allergies (apparently I have mold allergies, and really never knew it until this week when they KICKED MY ASS) have made me hack like a 3 pack-a-day smoker and have made me pretty much unable to sleep.
Aside from traditional dance they also had a more playful choreographed dance/skit with dancers dressed in school uniform. I think this was a nod to the portion of the temple dedicated to Thai school, where kids can come to learn their language and culture. There was also of course, like the Thai Town fest, a beauty pageant. The ladies were in gorgeous traditional garb, a sight to behold. Pretty much all of the MC and live entertainment (except where pageant contestants answered in English) was done in Thai, so we weren't entirely sure what everything was about, but loved every minute of it.
Rule Four Point Five: Blades don’t need reloading. See rule one.
Here's a few useful Links to help you learn more...But don't stop here there's plenty more info to Google and learn more about on Worm Castings and it's benefits... Google away!
I decided to cut out the flowers from the indie bloom. Wish I have this set of stamps to coordinate. But the flowers from Sweet Threads Labels does the job! I pulled out my Spellbinders and made an ornate title "isn't she lovely?" for this page. A bit distressing (on the edges of the circle) was applied to make the colors more cohesive with the Basic Grey flowers.
The color run, all sorts of wonder follow.
Akhee Ahn : When we first started, we sounded much closer like 70's punk rock. But during several member changes, we've changed a lot. But I think it's getting better. Although I throw away the strict ethos of punk, now I learned how to play more music. But our direction isn't changed. the direction is "making new music for new people".
I became friends with this other guy a week after me and the boy had a chat. He was a bartender and he asked me if I could join his workmates for drinks before me and him both go out to our weekly fix-the gay clubs in the Valley. One of his workmates' cute, he was out of my league.
Accidental Chicken Soup
*Blog about this giveaway (please re-post often!)
A simple colour negative film that I buy in bulk whenever I see it in Poundland. It's the first film I tend to use in my cameras, as its so cheap and I'm always happy with the results. My holga loves this film, whilst my Diana Mini, not so much...
Widow of John Walton inherited her wealth after the former Green Beret and Vietnam War medic died in an airplane accident near his home in Wyoming 2005. Now world’s richest woman, she got an extra bump in her fortune because of her late husband’s early investment in First Solar; shares up nearly 500% since 2006 initial public offering. But bulk still comes from her holdings in Wal-mart, the retailer founded by her father-in-law Sam Walton and his brother James in 1962. Today Wal-Mart has sales of $405 billion, and employs more than 2.1 million people. The philanthropist supports museums, education and organic
A redhead with blue eyes and a penchant for all things sparkly.
Knowing my guest were not real spicy eaters as we are I found some mild chorizo at a local market known for carrying south American ingredients (great array of cheeses) off Route 27 in South Brunswick. I wrapped thighs around the sausage, and slit open the breasts, then closed them up with toothpicks once I felt the amount of chorizo was sufficient. I mixed together well chopped cilantro, lime juice, corn syrup, brown sugar, salt/lemon pepper, and olive oil for the outside marinade. Leave in mixture for at least hours. I did feel I should have added more brown sugar for a better blackened coating, but it all tasted wonderful.
Nintama: 298
Spanky waxed philosophical. He's not simply trying to have different beers than other folks in the city, he said, he's following his passion for beer. That is not, as a look at past tappings will show, the same ExTRemE! beer passion so many others have hared off after. He told me he's looking for brewers that are making good beer that don't market it that well. Penn Kaiser Pils would be an excellent example, he noted, and he'd have it if the supply were steady. I like the way he thinks. I get really bored seeing the same great beers everywhere I go.
Wot ye what? they called me,
Week 13-vs Indianapolis Colts-1:00pm-December 2, 2012
I am super sorry I did not use one of their cute images but I am waiting to get some copic paper in. I happen to be one of those people that likes to stamp or print off a few images and get started on coloring. I color skin and hair. I try hair combos mostly to see which I like better and try different hair stokes. I must say I bought all of Krista's newest images and went crazy with my last paper. Only to find out I hated the way I colored all their hair except one :(. I have some Neenah Paper which bleeds a lot (I am not an experienced colorer... I know I color good but it normally take one or two tries before I get a finished image). I love X-Press It paper. I need to try some Make It Crafty paper but that is an even longer wait!
In the 1980s she again guested on “The Love Boat” and “Fantasy Island”. Another guest spot was on “Murder She Wrote”. In 1985 she started a 9 month run in the daytime soap Loving playing a tough mother and business woman.
Maoists have claimed responsibility for kidnapping Bosusco Paolo and Claudio Colangelo from a forest on the Kandhamal-Ganjam border on March 14 and demanded the state government to fulfill their demands by Sunday evening. The matter came to the fore on Saturday night following the extremists letting off Sontosh Moharana, a cook, and Kartik Parida, a helper, who had accompanied the Italian duo.
Ugh. Ryan and I searched the helmet box, the manual sheets, and the white envelope, but alas, no decals. A Stormtrooper does not panic, right? So I posted some threads on the Golden Gate Garrison and the First Imperial Stormtrooper Detachment ("FISD") forums for recommendations, given my dire situation. There is Trooperdecals, but he is located overseas and I need the decals before Friday. Ugh.
The girl who sat next to me in the oboe section in band was dating a very young cop when she was a junior in high school, and I guess that stuck with me. I made sure there are towns that employ 19-year-old policemen before I wrote that into the story. I’m always on the lookout for places where adulthood and childhood clash, because that puts a lot of stress on the characters an creates an interesting novel.
Bacon Lover’s Mac and Cheese
Mama’s tears came when you said you missed me,
Cheesetown is in Central Scotland.
Its delicious. More fact.
Lakewood Montessori Middle School has gone digital. If you have access to the Internet, you have access to over 200 ebooks from our collection.
UBC remains committed to providing our academic community with the resources it
We have 3 cars, and a three car garage. And only 1 car is in the garage. Mine. My husbands truck is too tall, and his car is on the patio which is covered and has a slope to drive up on. In the garage is a 30 ft smoker, and all kinds of kid stuff and my Tahoe. That's it.
(plus a sentiment)
Maternity clothes: This past weekend I was convinced that I was officially bumped out. However, today, nada. It’s so insane to me how you can look 4 months pregnant on Monday and not pregnant at all on Tuesday. I blame it on the fact that all of my innards are shifting and perhaps this is making digesting a bit slower. All of the food just sits there creating a faux bump. Oh well, I’ll enjoy these last few weeks of flat bellydom because once I do bump out and can’t even put on socks, I’ll be missing this time of ease!
I will not stop writing, and I sincerely hope that other writers feel the same.
There you see the ideology and nature of the new economic czar. He believes that the government should redistribute wealth in order to reduce poverty by focusing on massive government spending in infrastructure, agriculture, public education, public health, and other welfare programs like breast feeding and food stamps, and control or manage population.
This post is not what you expect. It's not going to waffle on about the advantages or disadvantages of e-books and apps or digital rights. There's enough of that out there already. Instead I am going to tell you what digital really means. There is a lot of mystification going on - some deliberate and some just the result of extensive ignorance.
2.burn the dance clubs
Who would be in your dream cast for Dawn of Angels?
Those of mechanics—each one singing his, as it should be, blithe and strong;
I am off to find me a new host, I have a theory that they are trying to chase people away so they can shut this all down. :-(
J: Job title: quality assurance review specialist
But the report reads: “The effectiveness of the policy remains to be seen. And the richest clubs will almost certainly continue to generate massive sums and fund growing salary bills.
But as I designed, the houses started getting bigger. More and more things became essential. I would need a place to brew beer. I would want a studio to paint and write. Somewhere to sleep, and yes, somewhere to eat might be nice.
As I used to tell my friends up Punta La Marmora where the goats roam free: I’ll see you all tomorrow when I’ll explain the basic logical operations of semi-conductors, eleven ways to sex a mollusc, and how to do CPR using a couple of jumper cables and a bag of lemons.
Hope y'all are having a good night.
“Our volunteers are important to us; we not only benefit from their contributions of time and talent, they are our strong connection to the community,” she says.
If you work for yourself — and even when you work for someone else — you have to do it.
One can imagine that The Goog will not be too far behind…
GMA 7′s senior vice president for entertainment Wilma V. Galvante has retired. There’s no truth to rumors that Galvante will be replaced by Annabelle Rama.
All of her things were packed so she too left the room, a rented out one in one of the shops in town. She carried the crate with her both of her hands out of the building, with nods to the shopkeeps as they went about their daily business.
Let’s get a grip and accept the fact our weather is changeable and stop complaining about it.
Prior to FDR, the American people took care of their OWN, family by family, town by town, county by county, state by state. They had NEVER had welfare, and in fact found the very concept of welfare distasteful. And I’m going to tell you right now that they were better, stronger people than we are as a result of that moral superiority and that faith in THE PEOPLE and not the GOVERNMENT.
In the summer I can wake up to a half-messy home and feel good about going outside, swimming, play-dates, and having fun. But something about the cold that makes that impossible for me. I wake up FREEZING, unable to move from under a blanket! I feed the kids anything that I can grab that doesn't require me to go into the cold kitchen for more than 3 minutes, and in the recliner I stay with a great book and slippers until one of the kids starts hollering for more milk. It is then that I realize that this is my last moment of tranquility I will have the rest of the day! Once my leopard print slipper hits that floor it will never return till the next morning!
Ironically there was one more rendition of this song besides the three I’ve written about from Monday. Edgar Winter did an explosive version of his own with some mighty players. Gotta save that one for another time. Can you imagine if those guys were up on that stage with these players as well. Whew!
"Happy Hearts Day to those who are taken, still-to-be taken, taken for granted, assumed to be taken, needs to be taken, waiting to be taken, almost taken and who will never be taken! Spread the LOVE!!!"
Naman was growing increasingly uncomfortable with the tone and tenor of Savage’s remarks. There were more lewd comments, profane words and innuendo. And then, Savage said something that made Naman take notice.
FACT: Although the story was recorded as four separate episodes, it was broadcast as two 45-minute episodes to avoid clashing with the Winter Olympics.
Using the Monarch Die-Namic border and the My Mind's Eye Happy Go Lucky 6x6 paper pad, I constructed an Easter card to match my eggs!
Try not to let this happen to you…
(My Girl's A) Hologram b/w Criminal
McHugh's announcement comes after a period of massive growth for JBLM. Since 2003, the installation has grown by roughly 15,000 Soldiers and seen a military construction program totaling $1.75 billion, putting it among the largest bases in the United States.
It's been a really long time since I've posted here.
However, the bunnies now have a double glazed window in the back of their hutch and the light makes it a much better place to be. They can see where they're going now.
And beautiful fresh Seared Tuna, drizzled with a Nicoise style salsa
feminine.
1 purposes
Leave to rise in a bowl covered in cling film (or a shower cap) for an hour to double in size.
In a large bowl, mix together pumpkin puree, eggs, oil, water and sugar until well blended. In a separate bowl, whisk together the flour, pudding, baking soda, salt, cinnamon, nutmeg, cloves and ginger. Stir the dry ingredients into the pumpkin mixture until just blended. Pour into the prepared pans.
Like any inviolable rule, it must first be broken in order for its nature to be revealed. And this is what our teenage years are for, of course. That intemperate period of our lives in which the visceral passions spew forth and darkness traces its first outline under our eyes. A time when we are all Heathcliffs, when we are crotchety and brooding and questioning of the established order of things.
5. Whats your creative process?
I’ve reflected and rejoiced, I redeemed myself from the dark
I am thankful for all my family and friends. An experience like this makes you glad that you have both. So please everyone be careful and watch out for those who think they don't have to do the right thing.
A time to cozy up on a comfortable sofa, encased in a favorite blanket. A time to drink a favorite warm beverage—coffee, tea, hot chocolate—and delve into your stack of unread books while watching the snow fall and blow.
Now when the people complained in the hearing of the Lord about their misfortunes, the Lord heard it and his anger was kindled. Then the fire of the Lord burned against them, and consumed some outlying parts of the camp. But the people cried out to Moses; and Moses prayed to the Lord, and the fire abated. So that place was called Taberah, because the fire of the Lord burned against them.
Welcome to Author Lissa Price
What’s next for Apple’s iPhone line?
The Damnation Alley refers to a path of lower radiation throughout the central United States in which the two Landmasters travel. It is the path of least resistance, which is a peculiar concept considering one of the Landmasters is loat immediately in a storm, then the survivors encounter carnivorous cockroaches, vicious rednecks, weird, violent storms, and a flood before making it to Albany.
May 5, 2011
22-23
I mentioned it to my daughter and she said her boyfriend had complained about the same problem.
100ml strawberry vodka
Most every horse owner fancies themselves as being a horse trainer and unless they are wanting to do something specialized, most feel there can't be too much to training. Just watching a few shows of the horse fare on TV will make some feel they can go out there and do it themselves. It really doesn't work that way. Modern folk, unless they can devote all day every day working with many different horses, don't have the time, experience or judgement to make a decision as to how to proceed with a horse or even know when a horse has learned and can move on to the next step.
No reason why your wardrobe has to be one-note. Kick things up a notch with unexpected jewelry by Kristen F. Davis.
He shoves Sharif into the car with two other people, interrogates him, mocks him and—at one unexpected moment—smacks him hard across the face. Up until now, we haven't been too involved in the movie. But now Peck and Sharif have finally been brought together, and suddenly we're drawn in.
Just over 1 cup boiling chicken or vegetable stock ( I always add a tiny bit more stock than couscous )
Two hours ago I still had some hope, but I've since given up on that. I thought I saw a bright shiny light, but I don't see it anymore now. To me things seem pretty bleak. I wear my depression like a darkened cloak that makes me invisible to the world. I think I can do whatever I want and it will make no difference.
For once, it would seem that things are actually slowly, but surely smoothing out and our sense of direction is getting clearer on a daily basis.
Here are a few before pictures. Notice the wallpaper....yeah...it is G~O~N~E!!!!!
After two weeks, the bruises on my elbows are barely noticeable but my back and right ribcage are still sore. Apart from the physical effects, I am also psychlogically scarred. After the fall, I have developed a slight phobia for chain barriers. Whenever I see one, I'd winced at the memory of my folly.
for your Parisian notebook...
Monday morning at 11:00 am my phone rang. I'm not embarrassed to say I was still kind of asleep as last weekend had really worn me out. I saw the number was from our agency and I thought it would have to do with a previously presented situation and working out the specifics of a child we had already agreed to accept into our home.
Well I am happy to report that it exceeded all of my expectations and then some. The close to one hour-long movie created around the classic song “I only have eyes for you” . Wikipedia tells us that ”I Only Have Eyes for You” is a popular song by composer Harry Warren and lyricist Al Dubin, written in 1934 for the film Dames where it was introduced by Dick Powell and Ruby Keeler. Although I knew the song I did not realize that it is that old and always thought that it was from the 50′s. It just goes to show you how little I know. But lets get back to the Hirshhorn.
that I might see the path before me. I love this journey,
Sprinkle in the olives (I used green Sicilian and black Ligurian olives) and pulse until the dough starts to gather into a slightly sticky ball.
I know I say I would make this blog about family but I’m dying to talk about the service also. The service was a wonderful service. It was not a normal funeral service that I would go to , it was like a sunday service were you would sing joyful songs and to me I think that was nice way although it was a sad occasion. Because it taught me that life should celebrate no matter if you are living or dead.
Stamps: Something Sweet
9. II A blown away leaf
School is now officially out for the summer. It’s probably time I just push through this post and get it out there…before summer is over and we enter into a whole other mess of worries and anxieties and issues! This particular blog post has been sitting in my drafts for days and days now. I just haven’t been able to bring myself to fully think through and process the whole thing. I can’t seem to grasp (or don’t want to grasp) the thoughts swirling and spiraling in my head. I am not completely sure why but my guess is because just thinking about it raises my anxiety. If I think about it too much doubt, worries, fears about whether or not we made the right decisions creep in. Worrying and second-guessing come naturally to me so I like to avoid and “stuff” all things which I don’t want to deal with…like then maybe it won’t happen. Denial…I could not possibly be sending my son to all-day, mainstream Kindergarten in August where he will ride the bus, eat lunch and be in a class of TWENTY other children with ONE teacher! All. by. himself!
I can identify. I try to be funny around here sometimes and my success rate is probably in the neighborhood of an Orson Scott Card keynote speech at the Democrat National Convention. I'm going to stop typing for a minute to give everyone a minute to recover from that hilarious image....
On last Saturday we went to the San Louis Waterfall and it was absolutely beautiful! It was also really tall and fell into several different pools. I
Start brewing the espresso. Add the remainder of the ingredients to a small saucepan on low and whisk together well. Remove from heat when it warms, but isn’t hot. Pour espresso into a 16 oz mug and then pour cacao mix into the espresso and give a small stir. If you want to make it more of an adult beverage, use a shot of Rumple Minze (or other peppermint schnapps) at the end instead of adding the extract.
Like usual, I was racing the clock on the road. By some miracle, I made it to Calvin College’s confusing campus with nearly 10 minutes to spare, despite having had to make a recordly quick pit stop on the two hour drive (there are some downsides to being too hydrated). Just as I was about to ask a stranger to point me in the right direction my friend Lindsey Slot (otherwise known as Spicy) called. “Hi, Grace! I’m at the Faith & Writing Festival at Calvin. I don’t have much time to talk, because the next thing is starting in like 5 minutes, but I wanted to let you know I might be able to slip away to hear you talk at Cornerstone.”
I ordered the medium size print in "blues".
I'm so happy with these! I grabbed a friend and braved the yard sales this morning even though it was so hot oh my god why, but it totally paid off. I love the little set of '50s storybooks and the '40s stacking toy, and the weird little bird thing that makes a jingle-jingle sound and wobbles.
If your firm preaches an open door policy, please ensure that your team knows it’s for real and that you get the best out of it by listening to people and their experience of working on the front line, and the real time problems that prop up from time to time. No one can help get inputs from your internal and external customers better than the ones from your team who are engaging with them on a day-to-day basis.
And speaking of that, I recently started my own group and that's what I wanted to post about.
I will later rock in an old chair in the rain, on the squeaky wooden porch, with a fragrant cup of coffee in my hand, and watch tiny geysers spring onto my lap. I will turn my face upward into the rain for the cleansing of my sorrows and fears. I will wander aimlessly through the hazelnut orchard, tugging and releasing wet branches over my head. I will baptize myself until I feel young again.
Me: Ethan? Did you pee in this?
So... Can you guess the topic yet from the title? It's about everyone's favourite Ugandan evil warlord of the moment, KONY!!! STOPKONY2012ASIFITCANBEANYOTHERYEAR!!111
I was reminded this evening, although I didn’t actually need reminding, that it’s been 17 sad years since we lost a beautiful lady in our lives, a wonderful auntie who never had her own children yet lived every niece and nephew as if they were her own, treated them, laughed with them, taught them and disciplined them.
In honour of dear friends moving away and inspired by our recent holiday in France, this dish was the first course of a four course French themed feast for the occasion. My wife and I had this at a restaurant in France, La Ferme Ladouceur, and all I had to go on was my memory of the dish and a photograph I took at the restaurant.
“Let’s say €8.00 for that,” he tells his final customer, discounting a book by 50pc. He walks them to the door as a group of locals arrive with a book-shaped cake. Even in retirement there is no getting away from books. Inevitable gags are cracked about “eating his words” as Michael says his farewells.
Contact me by email at
Gucci init, LV init or emptiness init?
She's also thinking
Of course, as is customary, delicious pizza will be served throughout, Ale Stars will have the chance to ‘Ask the Brewer’ and Beer Trivia will be presented in between beers. Strap yourselves in for that one! Also available on the night will be a range of special limited release items and memorabilia including T-Shirts featuring ‘I Was There When the Prof Hosted Ale Stars’, ‘Ale Stars – How Good Was The New Bloke?’ and ‘Shandy – I remember him!’ Also, don’t forget to pick up your ‘Prof. Pilsner for Ale Star Tzar voting cards. Just pop them in the box provided – I’ve already filled them in for you. That’s just the kinda bloke I am.
Please join us for the 2012 Berkeley / Davis Joint Colloquium. This year’s Colloquium will feature a talk at 4:10pm by Prof. Rasmus Neilsen, followed by a reception in the statistics lounge. Grad students are also invited to the Berkeley / Davis Grad Student Colloquium from 5:30-6:30pm.
I didn't feel going on a late honeymoon was a justifyable enough reason to venture onto an aircraft and I was appalled at myself for being talked into clicking the little green button on the site labelled "Book Flights" but Paul had insisted and there was nothing I would not do for my husband. Ever since I had though, an incredible sense of forboding had begun to grow in my body and I even wandered once or twice if I should cancel it. I did not disclose my misgivings and my inward battle, they would not have been recognised anyhow.
Barack Hussein Obama is not half black. He is the first Arab-American President,
Read and annotate chapter two of Lord of the Flies. If you haven’t already, ask your parents to sign the syllabus. Your first character journals are due tomorrow.
‘Jason . . . I. . .’ I stared up at him. ‘I don’t know what to say.’ How could I? I was absolutely dumbfounded.
The Herald Tribune reports that
- Family friendly, but children must be supervised at all times
relationship. Some of us focus on the good sex that we’ve had with our partner, but
I am completely in LOVE.
Here is what Lela won....
Zach Galifianakis killed. The crowd was familiar with him, probably some from his show at UT last year, and ate it up. It's hard to single out anything in particular, he was just on and connected with the crowd well. Did his normal one-liners while playing piano and his "characters", a few I hadn't seen before.
Soon it is time to ready the babies for the walk to the gate(s). Sr. Ellen has to get special passes for us, as only ticketed people can go to the gates. Going through security is quite an ordeal--we have to put OUR shoes, purses and bags through ... fold up the stroller and put it and baby's bag through while holding the baby! After passing the security check, we get everyone settled in the correct stroller with the right bag and are off to the correct gate! The 9-11 surely has made things more difficult for us at SFO.
PSS – Please don’t hesitate to let me know one or two Methodist blogs that you really, really like that I didn’t mention. Maybe I need to get it on my radar screen as well.
We could use the cash a garage sale, or craigslist/ebay whatever would merit, but with a barely working camera and the major headache of a garage sale and a husband who works most Saturdays lately and a broken down truck in the driveway.... I don't know if it's even worth it. I did sale some furniture already, (though I deeply regret selling this chair)... but I really need new couches (and to repair that dang truck) and so the money, even if not much sounds great. So, I know it will either be a garage sale, or I am calling up a charity to come and haul off tons and tons of boxes and can only hope that we could get a decent tax write off.
Jack Holloway is a likable character from the start. Although he is definitely a jerk, he’s a pretty funny jerk and it is clear early on that, despite his flaws, he actually isn’t that bad of a guy. He is an accomplished lawyer who was unfortuantely disbarred because of an incident that had nothing to do with his knowledge of the law, and he generally seems like the sort of guy who is a good man, but who definitely believes that the ends justify the means. The supporting cast are all strong, but Holloway is a pretty much perfectly developed character. Scalzi’s sense of humor is reflected clearly in Holloway’s demanor, and it suits the character perfectly.
so click on the pic below…and start shopping!
The card I am going t share with you, is using a technique new to me.
They love to try new things and aren't afraid to be adventurous and do the bold and exotic foods. From sea urchin to alligator they have tried it...Chef Insatiable and I encourage them to try things just once...then they can decide if they like it or not...but we always keep them involved.
My daily affairs are quite ordinary;
We finished off with a visit to Painted Cave before continuing south for some good Chinese food in Irvine. My only regret: I still haven't figured out a way to bottle the smell of Central Coast oak forest.
With the Mourning Doves nesting right outside, we see them quite frequently. The children’s interest in them has sparked so many conversations, investigations and projects. Yet, the most magical interactions happen when the children are playing.
Stone 10.10.10 Vertical Epic Ale 9.5%
3/4# chocolate malt
Layered over that is Luxe & Lush (originally 'Flaming Gems'), which is a topcoat filled with iridescent flakes. The flakes are really gorgeous and the colors in them range from gold and green and pink to blue and purple (click on the photo below to enlarge it so you can see the flakes better...they're so pretty!); it's original name really suits the color. I'm going to love layering this over lots of different polishes, it's such a fun addition.
That experience was one of the most important and formative of my teenage years. It really set me up for returning to the UK and almost straight away moving to St Andrews to begin my first year at university. It gave me such person confidence, and let me see the world in a new way. It let me dream dreams larger than my world view as a quiet Scottish lad growing up in Selkirk in the Scottish Borders.
image from ww2gravestone.com
And the beauty of this keyhole dress, showcasing several vertebrae, is that it draws the observer's focus - BANG! - right onto the hooks-and-eyes mechanism that allows a bra to carry out it's function (usually lift and separate).
In a world that seems to be run by the major corporations, the stories where a lone hero takes on a megalithic corporation, brings down the owner of the company, and saves the world just are not plausible. Though I’m sure the presidents of the major corporations think they are indispensable, they are not. If they are eliminated, there will always be others to take their place, and the corporations will go on doing whatever it is that they do.
Anyway, I am on the other side of the process right now, interviewing interns to come and work here this summer. It's amazing what the perspective gives you. Sometimes, I think back to what I would have been like, I wonder how I was hired! Haha.
* Design and install Brooklyn Library Sesame Street Muppet Exhibit
What is doubly strange about my relationship with Mr Cope is that we were in the same year at C.F.Mott Teacher Training College in Liverpool. I remember seeing him a lot at College but we never really moved in the same circles .He did English.I did Sociology & Special Educational Needs.
* Started noticing birds.
Towns to watch for the next 3 days…. severe weather possible in the center of each ring… and the towns with the ring/square combination, watch out in particular.
Being across the pond this is all sort of a mute point now, there are no Targets here. I got to see what friends bought at the Jason Wu collab. and while everything was very nice I wasn’t too jealous as the same high-necked sun dresses and structured hand-bags are for sale at Primark. Everything is first lady suitable and Michelle Obama has set the new standard for work appropriate chic wearing a lot of Jason Wu’s creations. His mix of blues and whites is amazing as always and the trench coats are gorgeous (although I do have a very similar one from Brooklyn industries). Then I look at his Spring 2012 line and it’s just so amazing I can’t even speak. There are 100 ways to incorporate that kind of grace and shine into the mainstream collection so why is Target styling us down?
All the stamping is stamped off once first, to get a more soft look. The main sentiment panel image is one of the new stamps from the Apothecary set - I inked up the outline of one, and then die-cut it!
That way the math will always come out right.
I wouldn't let my kids watch "The Wizard of Oz" for years. And of course when they did they thought it was perfectly ridiculous and weren't scared at all. The Disney movies they had seen by then dealt with far scarier themes than monkeys with wings. Their culture is different from the one I grew up in, and I'm not talking about the unschooling culture here. The world is different than it was when I was growing up.
Knowing somehow
Battling an addiction to alcohol or drugs often has a negative impact on the alcoholic/addict’s close relationships. Their spouse, parents, children, other relatives, employers, and friends will be affected. As quoted from the AA Literature, Twelve & Twelve, (Twelve Steps & Twelve Traditions) pages 117-118:
13) Remove from the oven and invert the pan. Remove the cake from pan when it's completely cooled.
Or better yet, maybe I should put it in front of my computer screen!
With that said, it's been a busy time in the Dziekan household these last couple of weeks. Hubby is home for a few and what does that mean?!? Major Honey Do lists. Living a military family life means we do things a bit differently than most families around here. I spend the majority of my days as a "single momma" raising the brood on my own counting down the days until Daddy returns. When he does, we do glamorous things like get work done on Momma's car (can't have something happen when he is away), work on other Daddy only jobs, like feverishly building Pinewood Derby cars, and plan and execute much postponed birthday parties. Once all of that is done, we say our goodbyes, and then then hold on with both hands until he makes it back one more time. Only to do it all over again in another few weeks. Oh yea, this wife of a Naval Aviator stuff is oh. so. glamorous. not.
Mitzi Szereto’s controversial new take on Jane Austen’s classic focuses on what goes on beneath the women’s skirts and behind the men’s breech flaps. Moreover, Pride & Prejudice: Hidden Lusts includes a range of erotic encounters spanning from homosexual indulgences and sado-masichistic desires to masturbation and oral sex.
And I have been busy AND in avoidance mode. I'm just not in the mood to deal with much of anything. But... I do have good news -
When the sun lit the room, I finally remembered the phone, my heart sinking. I picked it up, hoping that I had been asleep and just dreamt that part. I don’t know what proof I was expecting to find. Deleted texts? But what I did find made me nearly cry in relief.
The stretch of infinite country;
me. These babies are not moving around very much, so I have to lay down and count kicks, is irritating me. Oh well, better luck tomorrow right? Can we just go back to bed, and start over?
‘Don’t do this, this is crazy, you know me!’
I’ve gone on at length here about my feelings regarding Dogfish Head’s brews. For my previous posts about DFH Brewing go HERE. I’ve tried one of their raisin concoctions, a peach disaster, an IPA, a chicory stout, an Indian brown ale and their pumpkin beer. I like the chicory, the brown ale and the pumpkin beer, which puts them at a 50% success rate in my book. (No reason to give up on someone at 50%, hell if that was the case Mrs. BeerRant would have left me years ago!) Bottom line: I like enough of their beers to continue trying them simply on their record alone, but factor in the personality behind the brewery and I’m always willing to give them a shot. So far, the series Brew Masters is at 100 percent.
Will be the final end of ill,
"Fine," Abby snapped at her, grabbing her bag and running out.
If you were to poke around the internet, looking at bits and pieces of the work that I’ve created over the years, (and heck, the ambiance of this blog!) you may have noticed that I enjoy interpreting and re-interpreting my favorite nature-companions: Trees!
This year, little rain. Weeds have already taken over AND gone to seed.
Every year I did a little more than the year before.My first 5 years I probably earned between $100 – $2,000 a year from acting.Year 6 brought me some of my biggest success and I only made $8,000 from acting.But, I put a lot more money into my career than that. Headshots are expensive. The photo session and getting prints can run anywhere from $500-$800. Classes range from $150-500 a month. It costs $1,200 to join SAG once you are eligible.And apartments are crazy expensive.$700 – $1,000 for a crappy apartment that you share with at least one roommate.Its no wonder my living room curtain was a bed sheet.
Kathe Koja – Impermanent Mercies
i am amazed by all the great finds miss mustard seed scores and all of her furniture restorations.
In response, angry MPs accused the police management of lying to them during previous meetings.
So it’s more about history for many, about being an expert in how things were, and a perspective on how we are. It’s also about wearing neat clothes and living life as someone else for a while. And about adding your personality to that character, reacting to your surroundings as that person might have, as the two ladies on the swings did—had they been dressed like that and walking through a park and seen the swings, of course they would have hopped on and gone for a ride.
Walnut Brewery Schwarz Hacker
mirin, soy sauce……….6 tbs each
FIR & Chargesheet:
I've been trying to eat a healthy and balanced breakfast full of protein and a little fat. In all the research I've read, this seems to be a good idea for somebody who is like me--IE--someone who needs something fast that tastes good because they don't have much of a chance to eat throughout the day because they are so busy taking care of tiny people they hardly have a minute for eating something balanced and nutritious!
The Social Club would be non-profit but would require a small donation from any members using the minibus to donate to the 'maintenance fund' to keep the minibus in tip-top condition etc. Because the minibus would be insured for any driver over 25, we can see no reason why any member cannot take the minibus themselves without us if they so want. Obviously we'd have to 'know' these members.
While some may ‘misuse’ it, there are many young people who use it to pay for their lunches at school. Without this vital support from the Government, many teenagers would be told by their parents that they can’t stay in school. The SNP’s protection of the EMA is a very strong support for young people.
By filing this tiny form, you will avoid the late-filing penalty, normally five percent per month based on the unpaid balance. In addition, any payment made with an extension request will reduce or eliminate interest and late-payment penalties.
If you would like a postcard..one day...from somewhere...
Chuck said, "Well, then, just bring me the dead horse."
On balance, enough done. I think. Or maybe not. Time will tell. See if I'm still here next year....
Attendees will have a chance to win a Galaxy Nexus, Galaxy Tablet 7.7 or a SMART TV.
beyond and involved, evolved with the foxgloves,
Back again at 13h30 and by 14h30 the truck arrived.
In his declaration, however, he did not give any details on those “mistakes” that are, concretely: 33 civilians murdered, 225 tortured civilians, 20 victims of rape (17 women and three men), and three forced disappearances between December of 2006 and December of 2011. The latter information is contained in 82 archives from the National Commission on Human Rights. In addition, amongst these “mistakes” from the Army are those linked to the murder of five children, the torture of 10 children, the raping of two youngsters and sexual abuses against other two.
He married Zora Lyman, a fiddle player who performed and recorded with him. Eventually, Luther shifted his focus to children's songs, enjoying considerable success with his recordings on which he sang and told stories. Among the popular albums for children that Frank Luther released were "Raggedy Ann Songs & Stories" and "A Child's First Birthday Record."
At the first sign of decent weather (yes, we have had a little) Hubby and youngest son sprang into action and fenced off the bottom third of the garden: The chix were confined to barracks. We’re lucky enough to have a fairly big garden, so the chix get to free range to their hearts’ content, within limits. A few days’ power-washing and the patio is as good as new. A bit of tidying around the flower beds, wood chip applied and the garden’s looking fit again. Oh, and the heucheras have survived and are growing fast: The chicken poo has compensated the garden for the ravaging.
Milk - 1/2 cup
Tommy McClure - bass
4/20/12
What were you even thinking, crawling along my car stereo with your big long hairy legs, heading for the steering wheel where my poor frightened hands were clenched as I attempted to drive? Huh? HUH? Didn't you know I'd scream like a banshee and swerve toward oncoming traffic? Didn't you know I'd holler at the Kris Face, who just happened to be in the passenger seat, to smash you to smithereens? Too bad he had to do it with his bare hand...ewww! Welp, now you're looking all dead. Ha!
free of clinging branches
and James Gandolfini.
Further, the Planning Commission’s approach paper to the twelfth five year plan makes it clear that there is no scope for a rise in public funding of higher education and the government is looking at the private sector as the engine growth in the higher education sector. The approach paper says: “Resource constraints will make it difficult to meet the need of expanding higher education entirely through the public sector. Not all private educational institutions are of good quality and some are quite inferior. Minimum standards will have to be ensured. But free entry will, in the end, automatically weed out the poor quality institutions. Private initiatives in higher education, including viable and innovative PPP-models, will therefore, be actively promoted. The current “not-for-profit” prescription in the education sector should be re-examined in a pragmatic manner…”
I am screencapturing this, because I am scared to death it will–POOF!–disappear and I want it to live on forever so that everyone will know how disgusting The Derp is.
“The swastika has morphed into a universal symbol of hate,” said Abraham Foxman, the national director of the Anti-Defamation League, a Jewish advocacy organization. “Today it’s used as an epithet against African-Americans, Hispanics and gays, as well as Jews, because it is a symbol which frightens.”
5. Do you have any suggestions for things you’d like me to do differently if I host another mini-readathon?
Attached from the The New York Times, Pertinent in light of recent erosion on Barrier Beaches. Submitted by Whiting Rice. Bill Ryan’s abbreviated Katia update first:
* Triple points with an AClub membership. (AClub is a free loyalty program accepted at more than 2,300 hotels worldwide. Visit www.a-club.com for information and to join.)
The site states "Hyperthyroidism is the most common hormone abnormality in cats. It is very rare in dogs. It is a disease of older cats. The average age at which it is first diagnosed is 13. Nine out of ten cats that develop hyperthyroidism are over ten years old."
"Then came the day for departure; the giant was taking his wife away to his distant castle.
bedroom in the back and a little bathroom, a walk-through kitchen, and a living
The Bata Shoe Museum in Toronto presents Roger Vivier: Process to Perfection beginning May 10, 2012. In this exhibition, the work of Roger Vivier, one of the 20th century's most important shoemakers, will be displayed for the first time in North America. Loans from museums around the world, including the Metropolitan Museum of Art, have been obtained to create a full picture of the work of this master shoemaker. I will be attending the opening party for this event on May 8th.
OK, today I was able to get 4 LeapFrog Tag books for $6.99. They are buy 1 get 1 free at Target this week but you better hurry because they were already selling out by the time I got there at 11:30am. I also had 2 $5 coupons for the Tag books. I posted last week how to get those coupons. Finally I had a $3 coupon sent to me from Leapfrog.
For the last several years, I’ve been using a new approach to Bible Reading. On Mondays I read from the Law (Genesis through Deuteronomy), on Tuesdays I read through the History (Joshua through Job). On Wednesdays I read the Wisdom books (Psalms through Song of Solomon). On Thursdays I read through the Prophets (Isaiah through Malachi). On Fridays I read through the Gospels and Acts (Matthew through Acts of the Apostles), and on Saturdays I read from the Epistles to the end of the New Testament (Romans through Revelation). On Sundays I read Scripture that is pertinent to the sermon that I’m preaching that day. I really like using this concept because I’m able to glean from every section of the Bible each and every week.
you are my refuge in the day of disaster.
CONCLUSION: A decent party / rival fraternity college movie. It doesn’t get hunkered down by the romance, and keeps the comedy central to the plot. Slightly better than American Pie 5: The Naked Mile. We shall be progressing to American Pie 7 before too long.
Panini just released some images and details for its 2011 Playoff Contenders Patches product scheduled to be released sometime in February. I haven't been a big fan of the Contenders line in the past (aside from last year's Season Tickets set), and I don't think I'm going to be a fan of this year's either. It's not that 2011 Contenders is a bad product. Actually, I think this is going to be a very nice product with value for collectors. I'll get into the negatives later, but here are some of the good aspect Contenders offers.
My heart and soul like to visit Shutter Sisters 365 blog. I am attracted to photography as storytelling, and this group of women is walking amongst us with their camera straps around their necks, documenting every single day of this life.
lets go up on the roof
Let your passion for design and innovation help grow and improve a network of sites that is viewed by millions of people every month. Fisher Interactive Network, a division of Fisher Communications, operates news, lifestyle and community information websites throughout the country.
navy and white pearl card
More Monochrome Set; Jorge Reyes
Vyst could feel his fingers now, and soon his toes. The gods had paralysed him when he and his minions had first broke out of their domain in Vesuvius. They had planned to overthrow the gods and over take the world. They captured the city of Pompeii before the gods could stop them and buried the whole city in ash before giving themselves up. Now that Vyst was beginning to regain his powers he could plan to take revenge on the gods. From one of his hypnotised minions he found out that a son, the heir to his kingdom had been born to Jupiter. Vyst had puzzled out how to take revenge on the gods, yet he still needed to draw a proper battle plan.
I have gun-toting law-and-order right wing readers. They agree.
According to the blurb in the book The Draft House opened back in 2009, it is one of a small chain of three bars. It is a small place, if you know the Harp in Charing Cross then think along those lines but without the upstairs part. Luckily we arrived early enough on Saturday evening to bag a table in the window and after adjusting the curtain so cut out the cold December wind when the door opened it was a snug warm seat.
I know it may be hard to believe but there is a silver lining in all of this news. The former members of GSC have already gone ahead and created a new development studio called Vostok Games and are hard at work on their next project. They were unable to reach an agreement with the S.T.A.L.K.E.R. brand rights holder so the gang at Vostok forged ahead without it.
On Sept. 28, 1896, the day after the elephant burnt down, the Brooklyn Eagle published a eulogy of sorts for the prominent pachyderm, “Loss of an Old Friend.” The writer, using delicate language, suggested the elephant did not always attract the most esteemed clientele.
speaking when not spoken to:
Like these, for example:
I had a friend of mine, another designer, tell me just the other day that a client of hers had found my kitchen on the internet and wanted her to reproduce it. My friend said, "I've been in this kitchen!" Her client had no idea that the kitchen was in her own city...she just saw it online and liked it. My friend put her own spin on it, but it was very nice to hear that people enjoy the design!
And eat oatmeal cookies and ice cream and cake!
Do More because… well, it’s really easy to do too little.
I can understand what my nephews are saying and even what my patients at work (who have speech troubles) are trying to tell me because I have taken the time to learn their voice. If I had not been patient and sat with them and listened to what they were saying I would have never learned how to hear them. It is the same with God. I need to sit down day by day and take the time to get to know him so I understand the sound of his voice, so I can learn to hear his whisper.
I am gratefule for the bits of fabric that make up her bird mobile, and the way that mobile gently spins in the flow of air from her vent.
I have a broad interest in what I consider literature for the masses — story papers, magazines, paperback originals. For years these areas were like a newly discovered country with only a handful of us traipsing around wondering what we would find. Twenty or so years ago, there was a growth in academic interest in what was dubbed "trash aesthetics". I was rather pleased to see that my books and articles were often cited, not because I had a desire to see my name in print (I've seen it so often it doesn't fill me with quite so much excitement these days) but because it means someone has read something I've written and found something of interest in it.
We're also pretty sure that he has eczema. He has eczema patches on his right arm, behind his knees and his back, they look and act like Claudy's eczema which makes me so sad and it's a constant battle to keep him lubed.
Two hours later, I was kicking myself. Two additional hours later, I was celebrating. I loved it and it was worth every last moment. I LOVE this rug. Two coats of Polycrylic sealer to finish things off, an overnight drying time and BAM, furniture on it in the morning. I couldn't wait.
I can’t change
Unisex Collection
“You still have your chequebook, don’t you?” I replied, and for the first time that night I saw a smile break out on Mr Pricklewood’s face. I then heard the van pull up on the drive. “I’ll be leaving you now, Pricklewood,” I said. “I suggest you take a sleeping pill, otherwise you might find it difficult to get a good night’s sleep.” I walked over to the door and remembered one more thing. “Oh and Pricklewood, give Duckworth a generous tip in the morning. He’s had quite an eventful evening.”
The KGB did not want aware Americans who are healthy and truth seekers. They loved the idea of people who want to follow some Indian meditation scheme that teaches people to tune out the world and focus on things that had no effect on the real world.
feeling cold, especially in the extremities
I know it's a very small effort, but, I like being a small part of the bigger picture where MS research and support are concerned.
The arrival of Dylan Childress into her life changes that. A former child star, Dylan faded out of the limelight many years ago and has since been living in Montana, running a charter plane company. Taking a bit of a break and using it as an opportunity to investigate business practices in a down turned economy, he finds himself sticking around in Virgin River a lot longer than he originally planned. There’s some fireworks happening between Katie and him and he can’t bring himself to leave yet.
5. Profits from C corporations operating with a significant presence in New Jersey will be also tax-exempt.
Then it’s back into the brewing hall where Scott fills our glasses with Williams Red straight from the conditioning tank. It’s a straightforward, quaffable beer that gets an extra bounce from being super fresh and lively. We sup jug after jug of it while Scott explains his use of the Golden Ratio to devise malt bills (working out exact recipes for all the Williams beers on the basis of this knowledge is left as an exercise for the reader).
My favorite is that middle-aged dude standing next to a lake with a rope swing, who says “I sure did make some foolish decisions as a teenager, swinging out over those rocks…” He then goes on to sell us the latest and greatest pharmaceutical. I, however, somehow made it past my teenage years continuing to making foolish decisions jumping over rocks.And this is exactly how I discovered the key. Well, not exactly. I figured out my problem while reminiscing on the Amway business I poured my entire college experience into and failed at. All because I was convinced that happiness was found in having all the time and money one could ever want. It sucked the life out of me: I put 25,000 miles on my car in 2006, and the stress of complete failure/intense overwork is a major factor in what I believe contributed to my cancer development.*
Hmmm, clearly you haven't done much country living! Oh, you read a book once...did you now? Now where was I going with that thought? Hmmm, errr, nope it's gone... completely vanished into the ether... you know, the ether? of, oh, whatever the ether does... I don't have time to explain everything, I mean really! This is just a blog - not some world class novel! OK, so back to my story... as you know, or perhaps not, Mossberry Cottage is an old New England barn that was converted to cozy living quarters
There.
Now I can concentrate my efforts on the part of being an Astronaut Farmer that always intrigued me the most: gardening … Well, vegetable gardening in zero G is what really intrigued me. (Remember that scene from Lost in Space with the crazy space garden?) But since that isn’t possible here on Earth I guess experimenting with hydroponics and trellising will have to do.
The contracted carrots from the Rio Grande Valley farm are loaded in bulk onto a refrigerated truck maintained at 35 degrees and shut with a bolt seal to protect the integrity of the load. The load is shipped to Paris and then quickly unloaded at the plant. A devise called the “sputnik” crawls into the truck with a conveyor belt that gently pulls in vegetables from the lower part of the truck opening and delivers them to a second conveyor belt to be washed, sorted, and diced.
As you probably saw from the picture above, my style while camping is very relaxed but still fun! (If you hop over to my blog, you'll see that I try to make all my outfits fun whenever possible, even at work :) But the key while camping is bring lots of layers... during the day, it could be really hot, but at night the ocean winds cool the island down fast. Here I'm soaking in the sunset right before we cooked dinner, and it was already a lot cooler than earlier that day:
1/4 cup dark chocolate cocoa powder
Caravanserai.Do you remember it, that hymn from the old church
You'll notice that I did NOT provide a photo of the garden itself; until this afternoon, it was overrun with weeds, and the basil is so big it flopped over onto one of the pepper plants, and the tomatoes really overwhelmed the bamboo sticks that I tried in place of cages this year (good info. for next year). So it looks like hell, definitely not worthy of a photo. But it's still bringing me happiness--especially when I eat the teeny "sweet 100" tomatoes, which are really quite good.
With the need to learn more, I purchased a book, "Understanding the Tragedy of the Cathars" which I can't wait to start reading.
I hadn’t even posted there in more than six months, and have been only tangentially involved for the last two or three years. I had lost my passion for it sometime in there and it just took me this long to realize it. And, like most things in life, it’s only now that it’s gone that I truly miss it.
As far as I'm concerned, they didn't really do it for a flag or a King; they did it so that I and my children would never know the fear of waiting for the midnight knock; never have to show deference or respect to those who imposed themselves on us by force; never have to know the pain of carrying the truth in our heart but being afraid, on pain of legal sanctions or even death, to express it.
If you’d rather go out for your pizza fix, here are some options.
We've seen a lot from the more right-leaning economists over the last few years about how asset prices increases are inflation, because increases in the price of assets represent increases in the price of future consumption. I've been thinking about this, and I think they've got it backwards.
This week the Top Ten Tuesday list is all about our favorite bookish websites, apps, etc.
to drink,
I've heard many authors don't get cover approval for their first book. Did you? If not, did you have concerns about ensuring the cover fits the story?
Robinson packed up and headed to the nearby home of a friend, Joe Gardner, who is a district game warden. Gardner examined and took pictures of the wound before counseling Robinson to seek medical attention at the Down East Community Hospital in Machias, where he began a two-week regimen of precautionary rabies vaccine injections.
This is not a religious post, though I am going to use something the Buddha said as a springboard. You don't have to be a Buddhist to use it.
The sculptures are the creations of Giovanni Calabrese at Themedous. Each time Android launches a new OS you can be sure a new sculpture will be moving in to hang out with its foodie buddies.
*Alleviate constipation
During the first half of this year, statistic published on Bapepam’s website in July reported 24 corporate bond sales worth up to 27.01 trillion rupiah ($3.17 billion). It is also shown from the data that the action was taken mostly by companies engaged in banking and financial industry.
Novak, who has been an instructor at WCTC since 1990, said he was humbled to win the award and enjoys working with students.
but he didn't realize what the jersey represented.
Well, the cockroach is still the best emo metaphor, don’t you think? No? Emo!
Well the Bloggers are out in full force and completely hysterical!
Crown Deli, at 4909 13th Avenue, was run by Rivka Rabashkin, wife of family patriarch Aaron. Founded in 1960, it had a reputation not as a going concern, but as a sort of soup kitchen, with Rivka feeding for free anybody who was hungry. But it was close several times for health violations in recent years. I can not discover what ultimately did the place in, but have to imagine it was the culmination of the family's many troubles.
I do praise the person who build this Craigslist extension for putting time and effort in making its experience so much better. Someone with a passion put time and money into it to make it better, and shared that with the world. Nothing else than praise for this person. But, come on, it is pathetic that a tool like Craigslist is delivered in a way that these things need to be built.
but it's caught the world's attention because it looks so very much like an angel.
The so-called “Scramble for Africa” by Britain, France, Belgium, Italy, Germany, the United States and the other capitalist powers was essential for the growth and enrichment of the modern-day capitalist class, which included the owners of the biggest banks, syndicates and monopolies.
Why Africa you may ask? Well, I was hoping to do my Master's internship in Africa, but that didn't work out. I've been studying International Development and Non-profit management for 2 years. I didn't feel it would be right to do all that studying and reading, but never experience the true places. I'm also really lucky to have a friend, Brittni who is doing Peace Corps in Malawi. I'll be visiting her and traveling around for 5 weeks.
there are the movies you love.
“Don’t worry about it. I’ve got to check on some things. I’ll be back later. Tell van Baren you did as requested and hide the sword up in the loft. No one goes up there but me, anyway. If Sundrick gets back before me, just tell him I went hunting.”
Entries in the Third Campaigner Challenge will close on Monday, October 24th (at 11.59pm EDT).
